National Cancer Institute FY 1999 Questions and Answers provided For The Record for the FY 1999 House Appropriations Subcommittee.
These responses, developed by NCI program and OD staff, are to the questions submitted by Subcommittee members following the NCI Directors testimony before the Subcommittee.
__________________________________________________________________
Table of Contents
Advances in AIDS Research AIDS Among Minorities Alternative Funding Sources other than Tobacco Legislation Alternative Treatments Angiogenesis Barriers to Information on Clinical Trials Breast Cancer Due to Exposure of Vinyl Chloride Cancer Advocacy Cancer and Infectious Agents Cancer Centers Review Group Report Cancer Cube Cancer Genetics Network Versus Human Genome Project Cancer Genome Anatomy Project Cancer in Minorities Cancer Mortality Rates Cancer Primary Prevention Cancer Statistics Cancer Survivorship Causes of Cancer Causes of Cancer - Percentage of Cancer Cases Cervical Cancer Children and Cancer 1 2 3 Clinical Data Update System Clinical Trials Clinical Trials by Type of Cancer Clinical Trials Program Review Group Collaborations with CDC Coordination Efforts Coping with a Predisposition to Cancer Diet and Cancer Diet and Cancer in African American Women Dietary Guidelines Digital Mammography and Telemammography Director's Consumer Liaison Group Drug Resistance Environment and Cancer Fight against Cancer Five Year Cancer Survival Rate Genetics of Cancer Imaging Research Increase in Cancer Funding International Cancer Information Center Investigator-Initiated Research IOM Study-Cancer Among Minorities Major Unfunded Clinical Trials Minority Health Offices Multi-Valent Vaccine Against Cancer Causing Strains of HPV A National Agenda NCI Budget for FY 1998 - FY 2003 NCI Bypass Budget Versus President's Budget Ovarian Cancer Patient Access to Clinical Trials -- Draft of The Legislation Need Patient Access to Clinical Trials -- Involved in Clinical Trials PDQ President's Cancer Initiative Prevention Prevention Activities Progress Review Groups Prostate and Breast Cancer Progress Review Groups Prostate Cancer Prostate Cancer -- African American Males Prostate Cancer Among Hispanic Men Prostate Cancer Progress Review Group PSA Testing as Screening for Prostate Cancer Psychosocial Interventions Research Project Grant Pool Specialized-Comprehensive Research Centers SPORE Grants Strategic Technology Specialist Ten Year Budget Mechanism History The Disparity Gap Tobacco ASSIST Program Tobacco Cessation Initiatives Training and Fellowships Translating Prostate Cancer Research into Clinical Trials Trans-NIH Special Initiatives Vaccine Development ________________________________________________________
COORDINATION EFFORTS
Mr. Bonilla: Dr. Klausner, in the past the subcommittee has expressed its support for the National Cancer Advisory Board's 1994 report entitled "Cancer at the Crossroads" which concluded that the National Cancer Program suffered from a lack of coordination of cancer fighting efforts in the public, private and voluntary sectors.
As a result, the subcommittee recommended that the NCI take the lead in coordinating the nation's cancer prevention and control programs with the CDC and other federal agencies to reestablish coordination of the National Cancer Program.
Could you update us on your progress in this area?
Dr. Klausner: The NCI is wholeheartedly committed to implementing existing knowledge about cancer and adding to that knowledge base.
This commitment manifests itself in NCI's ongoing activities as well as in what might be termed special activities.
Both of these types of activities more often than not involve interactions with entities outside of the NCI including individuals, groups, organizations, other components of the Federal government.
While more research is certainly needed, making further national progress against cancer must also address issues that clearly extend beyond the realm of Federal cancer research programs.
A course must be chartered that identifies current limitations and builds upon a vital NCP to extend it beyond research to its application to all people and to include non-research, nongovernmental, and community constituents whose actions impact the cancer problem.
For these reasons, the NCI requested that the National Academy of Sciences through the National Research Council's Commission on Life Sciences and the Institute of Medicine establish the National Cancer Policy Board (NCPB).
The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDCP) participates with the NCI in funding this effort.
The NCPB membership brings together constituencies concerned about cancer control with those who conduct research and deliver health services.
Members are individuals with diverse expertise who have distinguished themselves, earning the respect and trust of one or more cancer constituencies.
The NCPB is charged with confronting obstacles and address issues that arise in the prevention, control, diagnosis, and treatment of cancer.
It will meet at least three times annually to examine ongoing research, new technologies, issues arising in delivery of care, and problems faced in the Nation's battle against cancer.
It also serves as a common meeting ground for the many federal agencies that sponsor or directly conduct relevant work as well as state and local health authorities.
The Board's most distinctive contribution, however, will be to render advice to the Nation in the area of policy and make recommendations to advance the Nation's effort against cancer.
The NCPB will convene workshops, gather information, commission papers, issue reports, and forge collaborations with other groups working on national policy issues surrounding cancer.
It has established a website with links to cancer policy documents and other pertinent sites, and will create a listserv network.
The NCPB has issued its first report entitled "Taking Action to Reduce Tobacco Use" that focuses on youth use of tobacco products and makes recommendations of specific steps that could be taken to reduce same.
The NCPB also has taken up the question of defining quality cancer care, and it is envisioned that it will also participate in defining criteria for the inclusion of cancer clinical trials in the cancer clinical trials demonstration project being conducted with the Health Care Finance Administration.
Many research questions of interest to the NCI deal with issues that are also related to the mission of other ICDs within the NIH or other entities within the Federal government.
In the case of certain Federal entities, the overlap of interests is sufficient to warrant ongoing interactions.
For example, the NCI has a close working relationship with the NIAID, the NIH Office of AIDS Research in coordination of research on AIDS and AIDS-related malignancies.
Similarly, it has recently been proposed that the Center for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) join the NCI in establishing a series of CDC/NCI working groups related to cancer communication, cervical cancer, special populations, cancer genetics, and breast cancer.
NCI has also interacted quite extensively with the CDC -- along with the American Cancer Society -- in the American Stop Smoking Intervention Study (ASSIST).
NCI holds regular meetings with CDC's Office of Smoking and Health for the purpose of coordinating tobacco initiatives.
The CDC is also involved along with the Department of Energy and the Nuclear Regulatory Commission in NCI's ongoing studies related to the cancer-associated effects of the Chernobyl nuclear power plant accident and the nuclear weapons programs of the former Soviet Union.
NCI and the CDC are also coordinating the preparation and storage of cell lines derived from the only relatively large, representative, population-based collection of blood samples of the U.S. Population.
This collection of cell lines is expected to facilitate significantly the evaluation of gene-gene and gene-environment interactions in development of a variety of human diseases including, but not limited to cancer.
It may not always be apparent just how many Federal entities have missions that touch a given question that is relevant to the mission of the NCI.
The NCI is very proactive in the coordination of these interactions.
As an example of the crosscutting and far-reaching nature of certain research questions, consider environmental carcinogenesis.
The NCI organized the Interagency Collaborative Group on Environmental Carcinogenesis over 17 years ago.
Members of this group in addition to the NCI are: Armed Forces Institute of Pathology; Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; Consumer Product Safety Commission; Department of Energy; Department of Labor/Occupational Safety and Health Administration; Department of Transportation; Food and Drug Administration; National Institute of Standards and Technology; National Center for Health Statistics; National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences; National Library of Medicine; National Toxicology Program; Smithsonian Institution; and U.S. Army Biomedical Research and Development Laboratory.
Similar groups exist to deal with other crosscutting issues and a large number of interagency collaborations involving smaller numbers of Federal partners also exist.
NCI leadership and staff have been and remain very proactive in seeking to establish collaborations and coordinate activities in areas of mutual relevance to other entities within the Federal government.
To illustrate the extensive nature of these interactions, the following data are provided.
In FY97, the NCI engaged in 61 agency agreements wherein NCI funds were provided to Federal entities outside the DHHS, and over $23 million in NCI funds were used for these agreements.
In another 44 such agreements, nearly $8 million in NCI funds were provided for projects within other components of the DHHS.
On the flip side of the coin, FY 1997 saw over 95 agency agreements involving nearly $17 million from other Federal entities for projects within the NCI.
NCI extramural staff is also very proactive in seeking to co-fund investigator-initiated grants.
In FY 1997, 92 grants were co-funded where another ICD was the primary sponsor, and 66 grants were co-funded where NCI was the primary sponsor.
It has been said that cancer does not recognize boundaries.
Normally, this statement is used to reflect the international nature of the disease.
However, it could also be applied in reference to the boundaries that separate Federal agencies from one another as well as the boundaries that separate the public from the private sectors.
Cancer is a problem that confronts us all.
Although the NCI serves as the focal point of the NCP, we are committed to the principle of a collective battle against the disease, and are striving to facilitate communication, cooperation, and coordination among all participants in the battle against cancer.
PROSTATE CANCER AMONG HISPANIC MEN
Mr. Bonilla: I was pleased to see the reports on March 12, 1998 from NCI, CDC and the American Cancer Society which showed a decline in the overall cancer incidence and death rates.
I am concerned by one finding of this report.
I understand that from 1990 to 1995, the death rates from prostate cancer decreased for all men, except Hispanic men.
On page 53 of your budget justification you discuss two studies of prostate cancer risk among African American, White and Asian men.
Is NCI currently conducting any studies to address the increase death rate from prostate cancer among Hispanic men?
Dr. Klausner: The recent report from NCI, CDC and the American Cancer Society showed a small increase in the prostate cancer death rate for Hispanic men from 1990 to 1995.
It is important to note that this increase was not statistically significant.
Nevertheless, the NCI did establish a study of prostate cancer patients in the NCI Surveillance Epidemiology and End Results Program in 1995.
This study is looking at prognostic factors, treatment and outcomes.
This study which will continue for several years is oversampling Hispanic patients in an effort to gather statistically significant results.
TRANSLATING PROSTATE CANCER RESEARCH INTO CLINICAL TRIALS
Mr. Bonilla: As you have stated in your budget justification and testimony, it is critical to translate research into saving the lives of patients.
One critical element in serving patients is the speed at which promising research can go into the clinical trial stage.
What is the progress at NCI for turning prostate cancer research into clinical trials?
Dr. Klausner: There have been significant gains in translating basic prostate cancer research into improved patient care and we will have more gains.
Most exciting are the recent findings of two NCI-supported studies of treatment for locally advanced prostate cancer.
These studies compared hormone therapy after radiation therapy with the traditional treatment of radiation therapy alone.
The combination was found to prolong disease-free survival and may prolong overall survival of patients with locally advanced prostate cancer.
Such findings take some time, the two studies took over seven years to complete.
Years of research focused on understanding how a cancer tumor develops has shown that cancer is a disease of altered genes and altered gene function.
In the past several years, scientists have made important progress toward identifying genes that increases one's risk of developing prostate cancer.
For example, in a recent study of Ashkenazi Jewish people, researchers found that men carrying alterations in either or both BRCA 1 and BRCA 2 gene have an increased risk for prostate cancer.
Scientist also are narrowing in on the location of the first hereditary prostate cancer gene, HPC-1.
Researchers estimate that one in five hundred men has an alteration in HPC-1.
Familial prostate cancer accounts for about one in ten cases, and HPC-1 alterations may be responsible for about one third of these cases.
We have made important progress toward understanding prostate cancer.
We now face the considerable challenge of converting our knowledge in this area into advances in prevention and treatment.
Toward this end, NCI is currently (as of March 1998) sponsoring 60 clinical trials in prostate cancer, including 18 Phase III studies --clinical trials involving new interventions closest to approval-- and nine trials in prostate cancer are underway at the NIH Clinical Center.
Information about these trials may be obtained through the PDQ, a comprehensive, computerized cancer information database.
A wide variety of cancer information is available from PDQ including details on over 1,500 ongoing clinical trials is now available through the World Wide Web -- http://cancernet.nci.nih.gov/pdq.htm.
PDQ contains an extensive register of clinical trial protocols, with information from studies around the world, full-text information statements describing the latest advances in cancer treatment, supportive care, screening, and prevention, as well as information about selected anti-cancer drugs currently under clinical evaluation, and directories of over 23,000 physicians and over 11,000 organizations active in cancer treatment and care.
Most information statements appear in two versions, a technical version for the health professional and a lay version that is in English and Spanish.
The database is updated monthly by editorial boards of oncology experts.
To help plan future scientific directions for several of our large, site-specific research programs, NCI established Progress Review Groups, or PRGs.
One of the first two PRGs, formed in April 1997, is focusing on prostate cancer.
NCI is using such groups to help define the national research agenda for these cancers and, in the future, for other site-specific cancers.
Ultimately, the PRGs have as a goal to develop a national plan summarizing current ongoing scientific activities and investigations, and describing, in priority order, unaddressed scientific opportunities that need to be explored.
There are numerous seminal questions about prostate cancer that need to be resolved through scientific investigation in order to determine how we can effectively prevent, treat and control this disease.
Among these questions are: What are the factors associated with and the mechanisms underlying the initiation and progression of prostate cancer? Why does this disease remain latent in some people but become invasive in others? Are there molecular markers that can predict risk for tumor development, or that can be useful for early detection of initial or metastatic disease? Do lifestyle/dietary factors account for variations in incidence in different populations? and, What chemotherapies or hormonal treatments are most effective in eradicating disease?
The Prostate PRG is in the process of assessing the scientific needs and opportunities in various fields related to prostate cancer research.
The group also will make use of a comprehensive analysis of NCI's current research portfolio, prepared by an internal NCI Task Force, and examine deliberations of previous groups and expert panels.
In June of 1997, over 100 members of the prostate cancer research and advocacy communities met in Chantilly, Virginia for intensive discussions of the research questions and priorities in prostate cancer.
The PRG is using information from this roundtable meeting and the portfolio analysis to develop a plan of action that addresses unmet research opportunities and needs.
To further assist in this process, the PRG has formed seven expert panels and has invited the input of thirty two "stakeholder" groups -- professional societies and advocacy groups who have an interest in prostate cancer research.
The PRG will prepare a written report that describes findings and recommendations; these recommendations will be integrated into NCI planning activities.
It is intended that the report will be ready to be released in the early summer of 1998.
NCI also has begun the Cancer Genome Anatomy Project (CGAP).
CGAP may ultimately allow us to understand and predict the biologic behavior of prostate cancer.
It may help us determine which prostate cancers need treatment and which do not.
Currently, prostate cancer is the most highly represented cancer site in the CGAP database with 16 cDNA libraries, over 29,000 cDNA sequences, and 352 tissue-unique genes identified to date.
However, CGAP is concentrating on five major cancers--breast, colon, lung, prostate, and ovarian cancers.
Also, it is designed to collect data for all cancers.
CGAP is intended to identify the molecular characteristics that distinguish one cancer from another in ways that will guide future approaches to the design and choice of effective interventions.
It will accelerate our ability to develop new markers for early detection and diagnosis of cancer, and provide us with the tools to unravel the interactions of genes with diet, hormones and the environment.
CANCER AND INFECTIOUS AGENTS
Mr. Hoyer: I understand that recent studies have shown a possible link between cancer and infectious agents.
For example, E. Coli bacteria may cause some forms of stomach cancer.
Was your institute involved in these studies? What do you think of these results?
Dr. Klausner: I believe you are referring to another bacteria named H. pylori as a cause of some forms of stomach cancer.
The NCI has been involved in a number of studies to investigate the role of H. pylori in the etiology of cancer.
In Shandong Province, a rural area of northeast China, where the stomach cancer rates are among the highest in the world, the intramural research program has been collaborating with the Beijing Institute for Cancer Research (BICR) since 1983 to assess risk factors associated with this disease and to test means for its prevention.
Initial findings showed increased risks associated with consumption of salt and a fermented local food -- i.e., sour pancakes -- while reduced risks were related to intake of allium vegetables -- e.g., scallions and garlic -- and beta-carotene and vitamin C-containing fresh fruits and vegetables.
In a gastroscopic screening program, chronic atrophic gastritis, an early precancerous lesion, was found in almost the entire adult population.
This screening program also found H. pylori infection linked to early stages of chronic atrophic gastritis and to its progression to more advanced disease.
Following a pilot study in 1994, a factorial study design has been used for a large-scale intervention trial to assess the effectiveness of H. pylori antibiotic therapy and supplementation with vitamins/minerals -- i.e., vitamin E, vitamin C and selenium -- and a garlic preparation in inhibiting or reversing the progression of precancerous gastric lesions.
In addition, progression of precancerous gastric lesions will be evaluated using a variety of molecular markers, such as immunochemistry to study the prognostic value of p53, H-ras, hMLH1, APC, erb B2, and cripto -- a gene in the EGF group that was recently associated with gastric cancer.
Also, an assessment will be made to determine whether rates of progression are associated with the presence of antibodies to cagA^+ strains of H. pylori or heat-shock proteins.
From observational data and sera, NCI investigators and their BICR collaborators developed and validated an enzyme immunoassay for H. pylori based on indigenous Chinese strains, and showed that it had slightly improved sensitivity compared to commercially available assays.
A small study is planned to test for the presence of H. pylori DNA in drinking water from villages in the Shandong area.
An effort is also planned to compare the age-specific seroprevalences of antibodies to the cagA and heat-shock proteins from H. pylori from counties with high (Linqu) and low (Changshan) gastric cancer rates.
In another NCI initiative, an evaluation is being carried out of risk factors associated with the high rates of stomach cancer in Poland and among Polish-Americans living in Cook County, Illinois.
Cases and controls were enrolled over a three year period and interviews conducted to collect information on ethnic origin, diet, tobacco and alcohol use and other factors.
Blood has been collected for assays of antibodies to H. pylori, serum pepsinogens, nutrient levels, and genetic variations -- polymorphisms.
Previous studies suggest that farmers are at high risk of gastric cancer.
Specific exposures that may account for the excess risk are unknown.
An ongoing NCI study in eastern Nebraska will evaluate a variety of factors, including pesticides, nitrate in drinking water, various other agriculturally-related exposures, and infection by H. pylori in relation to risk of gastric cancer.
Gastric cancer incidence rates in Japan are among the highest in the world, and gastric cancer accounts for 31 percent of all solid cancers in the cohort of A-bomb survivors studied by the Radiation Effects Research Foundation (RERF).
There is strong evidence of a radiation dose response for this cancer, especially among survivors exposed before age 30.
NCI intramural scientists, in collaboration with RERF, plan to initiate a study of the interaction of H. pylori and radiation as a risk factor of gastric cancer.
The study will be conducted using preserved tissue from high-dose and low-dose gastric cancer cases and applying new technological methods to detect the presence of H. pylori.
The results of these research efforts should help to clarify the role of H. pylori infection and lifestyle and environmental factors in the etiology of stomach cancer.
In addition, credible scientific evidence does exist for the linking of certain infectious agents with some forms of cancer.
Viruses such as hepatitis B and C cause liver cancer, some strains of human papillomaviruses cause cervical and other anogenital cancers and Epstein-Barr virus and other herpesviruses are associated with lymphomas, nasopharyngeal carcinoma, and AIDS related cancers.
Studies of these agents and the ways in which they cause cancer are being vigorously pursued.
More recently, publications have reported a linkage between the bacterium Helicobacter pylori, gastric ulcers, and possibly gastric cancer.
Eradication of the organism has been shown to induce long-term remission of peptic ulcer disease, but the pathogenesis of the organism in other gastric conditions and its etiological relationship to malignancy has not been clearly determined.
On October 16, 1993, the NCI sponsored a workshop entitled "Helicobacter and Cancer."
The purpose of the workshop was to assess the then current state of knowledge on the role of H. pylori in gastric cancer in humans.
The consensus view of the participants was that while H. pylori appeared to have a role in some malignancies, additional studies of this organism and related bacterial species were necessary to clearly define their relationship to human gastric and other cancers.
On the basis of these recommendations, in FY95 the National Cancer Institute issued an RFA for $1.5 million/year for four years.
The National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and Kidney Diseases provided $500,000 toward the project and cosponsored the RFA.
Among the eight NCI funded extramural grants is a natural history study in an Indian and Hispanic population in the Yucatan region of Mexico that has an extremely high rate of preneoplastic gastric lesions and stomach cancer.
Another project studies the biology of gastric lymphomas.
Other projects are using animal models to study chemical carcinogens in Helicobacter-associated malignancies.
Additional investigations will determine whether H. pylori strains obtained from gastric cancer patients are distinct from those obtained from patients with nonmalignant gastroduodenal disease such as gastritis and peptic ulcer disease.
In 1997 NCI also participated with NIDDK in sponsoring an RFA entitled, "H. pylori and its Relationship to Digestive Disease and Cancer," which focused on the role of H. pylori in peptic ulcer disease, nonulcer dyspepsia and gastric cancer in minority populations.
Applications received proposed to study the genetic susceptibility to and the acquisition of Helicobacter infections, the role of Helicobacter in development and regulation of the inflammatory response, and the relationship of Helicobacter to the etiology of gastric cancer.
The NCI funded two meritorious grants.
These research efforts will further expand our knowledge of the role of Helicobacter in the etiology of peptic ulcers and human cancer.
A recent publication has shown that one of the genes of a more virulent strain of H. pylori closely resembles a gene in Escherichia coli, a normal inhabitant of the gastrointestinal tract that is not known to be associated with cancer.
This gene is necessary for bacterial survival and has been shown in other bacterial species to be associated with increased ability to cause disease in the host.
This finding suggests that H. pylori mutants defective in this gene may be useful candidates for potential vaccines for HP-associated diseases.
PROSTATE CANCER
Mr. Hoyer: As you know, Dr. Klausner, prostate cancer kills more than 41,000 people each year.
It accounts for nearly one-fourth of all newly diagnosed cancer cases each year.
I am concerned that, in the past, your institute has not focused on prostate cancer research.
Can you tell me what you are currently doing in this area?
Dr. Klausner: The Institute holds prostate cancer as a priority and continues to encourage high quality research in this disease.
The Institute is currently sponsoring more than sixty clinical trials in prostate cancer treatment as well as studies to determine if the disease can be prevented and to determine if prostate cancer screening saves lives.
The increases in funding for prostate cancer research reflect the Institute's recognition of the magnitude of the problem.
In 1990 the Institute spent $13.2 million on research on prostate cancer; by fiscal year this figure had increased by 437% to $70.9 million.
Three Special Programs of Research Excellence (SPORES) have been funded to focus on translational prostate cancer research.
These SPORES are at Johns Hopkins University, the University of Michigan, and Baylor College of Medicine.
The Institute is also funding a number of investigator initiated basic science grants concerning prostate cancer.
The NCI recently established an intramural Urologic Oncology Branch to further concentrate on basic and clinical research in prostate cancer and other urologic cancers.
In July of 1997, the Institute convened a Prostate Cancer Progress Review Group.
One hundred thirty of the world's experts in all facets of this disease met to chart a course in prostate cancer research.
The group's first asked what are the pertinent scientific questions and the most appropriate approach to research in this disease.
A smaller group of experts is having regular meetings into 1998 to further assess the status of prostate cancer research and the direction it should proceed.
This review involves an assessment of current research and may result in requests for particular research in the future.
The final report of the prostate cancer PRG is anticipated by the summer of 1998.
NCI is continuing to increase its funding for prostate cancer.
We are currently supporting over 400 projects involving prostate cancer research, including over 60 clinical trials, and plan to spend over $89 million on prostate cancer in FY 1998 and $96 million in FY 1999.
The increase in spending for prostate cancer research has increased almost 25% from 1996 to the estimated 1998 funding level which compares to the 13% increase in total NCI funding.
OVARIAN CANCER
Mr. Hoyer: Ovarian cancer is the leading cause of gynecological cancer death.
This year, more than 26,000 cases of ovarian cancer will be diagnosed and more than 14,000 American women will lose their lives to ovarian cancer.
Has the NCI implemented any of the recommendations from the NIH consensus conference on ovarian cancer?
Dr. Klausner: The NIH Consensus Statement on Ovarian Cancer made recommendations concerning ovarian cancer prevention, screening, diagnosis, and treatment, as well as highlighted important directions for future research.
The NCI continues to work to strengthen ovarian cancer research in many areas.
The NCI, NICHD, and NIEHS continues to support research into the benefits of currently used oral contraceptives in reducing the risk of ovarian cancer, to further delineate the necessary duration of use for protection, other benefits and risks associated with OCs, and long-term outcome.
Currently underway is the NCI's PLCO trial, in which screening techniques for lung, colon, and ovarian cancer will be evaluated in 37,000 women.
Serum CA 125 and vaginal ultrasound are being used to screen for ovarian cancer.
The NCI is working now to identify new serum markers and imaging modalities which might complement ultrasound and CA 125 and identify a more effective screening regimen for ovarian cancer.
Up to 10% of ovarian cancer may be due to an inherited genetic susceptibility.
The NCI continues to work to delineate the genetic alterations responsible for this susceptibility.
In addition, the NCI has plans to establish a network of familial cancer research centers, which will facilitate study of families at high risk for cancer.
These centers will permit the evaluation of new screening techniques and prevention strategies, as well as help determine the co-factors necessary for cancer development in individuals with an inherited predisposition to cancer.
NCI sponsors over 70 clinical trials in ovarian cancer.
Through the Gynecologic Oncology Group and other NCI-sponsored Clinical Trials Cooperative Groups the NCI is working to find better treatment for ovarian cancer patients.
Studies currently underway are evaluating the timing of ovarian cancer surgery and chemotherapy, new chemotherapeutic agents, high-dose chemotherapy, and quality of life in ovarian cancer survivors.
Through NCI-designated Cancer Centers and individual investigators, as well as work within the NCI's intramural program, the NCI is working to develop innovative approaches to the treatment of ovarian cancer.
The NCI continues to work with HCFA, the Department of Defense, the Veterans Administration, and third-party payers to see that individuals with cancer have access to clinical trials.
Mr. Hoyer: Has the NCI established a specialized program of research excellence (SPORE) for ovarian cancer?
Dr. Klausner: While the NCI has not as yet established a SPORE in ovarian cancer, the Institute is committed to support research in this high priority area through the SPORE as well as other grant mechanisms.
The Executive Committee of the NCI reviewed and approved the concept of an ovarian SPORE to be presented at the next meeting of the Board of Scientific Advisors on June 22, 1998 for further concept review and approval.
If the concept is approved, a Request for Applications (RFA) for a SPORE in ovarian cancer will be issued by the NCI and considered for funding in FY 1999.
COPING WITH A PREDISPOSITION TO CANCER
Ms. Northup: You testimony mentioned the need to not only identify new genes to predispose to cancer, but to also learn better ways to counsel people with the effects of genetic testing.
This has been a concern of mine -- that individuals do not make rash decisions based on genetic testing to a disease.
Specifically, what is the NCI doing to develop methods to counsel people in an effort to help them cope with the impact of learning about a predisposition to a deadly disease?
Dr. Klausner: The NCI has a number of programs designed to learn how best to counsel people with a predisposition to cancer.
For example, a consortium of five cancer centers, led by investigators at the Lombardi Cancer Center, has been testing alternative strategies for educating women about their risk of breast cancer and what can be done about it.
A team at Duke Comprehensive Cancer Center is testing specially tailored means of communication for conducting pre-test counseling.
Another study, led by a team at the AMC Cancer Center, is pioneering phone counseling techniques to counsel women with a predisposition to breast cancer.
Other NCI grantees have been conducting similar studies with regard to colorectal cancer center susceptibility.
In addition, we work closely with colleagues at the National Human Genome Research Institute to coordinate our research activities with their efforts to improve counseling.
Through the Cancer Genetics Network (CGN), we will conduct a range of studies aimed at improving our understanding of how to counsel people about predisposition.
The CGN will commence in early summer and will involve a network of eight institutions around the U.S., with many satellite institutions as well.
The CGN represents the centerpiece of the NCI's commitment to communicate with both the public and high-risk persons about cancer susceptibility.
Thus, NCI has a range of current and planned studies intended to help people respond to the burgeoning information flow in the area of cancer susceptibility, to help people make informed decisions about testing and to cope with the results.
Understanding Gene Testing is a publication that represents an effort by the NCI and the National Center for Human Genome Research to provide basic information about gene testing and key genetic concepts.
This booklet also provides answers to a number of frequently asked questions about the science , potential benefits, and potential risks of gene testing.
As the relationships between genes and health become better understood and new genetic technologies are developed, additional information about gene testing and related issues will become available.
IMAGING RESEARCH
Ms. Northup: Some people have suggested that NIH is not doing enough in imaging research, and perhaps this should be delegated to its own institute.
What has NCI done in regard to developing better imaging technology and where will you go in the future?
Dr. Klausner: The NCI has since 1982 been supportive of Diagnostic Imaging Technologies.
A major contribution in recent years was the establishment of the National Digital Mammography Development Group, a consortium of seven institutions, including 2 commercial manufacturers, whose synergistic research efforts were focused on the development and clinical evaluation of digital mammography.
In 1996, the NCI recognized the increasing importance of imaging technologies, and designated this important topic as one of four "Extraordinary Areas of Research Opportunities".
This designation has resulted in increased support for Diagnostic Imaging in several ways.
First, NCI enhanced the organizational status of diagnostic imaging by elevating the Diagnostic Imaging Branch to the Diagnostic Imaging Program and provided increased resources with additional funding levels and staffing.
Second, the NCI has committed resources for the establishment and implementation of a national network that will perform cooperative trials in diagnostic imaging.
This dynamic Network will be capable of rapidly integrating emerging imaging technologies and new applications of established technologies into clinical trials for cancer diagnosis or treatment.
This Network will ensure that technological advances that may be of importance in the detection and diagnosis of a variety of cancers will not be delayed by the process of reconstructing the study infrastructure every time a new clinical trial is required.
Another commitment that the NCI has made to the advancement of imaging technologies was the establishment of an Imaging Sciences Working Group.
This working group is composed of recognized leaders from the imaging community, both from academia and industry.
This group was convened initially in July, 1997, and was challenged to identify the areas of imaging research that were most critically in need of attention.
The Working Group identified seven major areas of concern.
Subcom-mittees were formed in each area and were asked to meet as groups in order to make concise recommendations to the NCI.
These groups have all met at least once, have presented sections of their recommendations in draft form, and will meet again in the summer of 1998 to formally present their final recommendations to the NCI.
It is anticipated that these recommendations will directly aid the NCI in formulating future initiatives that would have the most broad-reaching impact on the health care.
In addition, the Diagnostic Imaging Program (DIP) at the NCI has continued its reorganization and growth in response to the recent emphasis on imaging research.
The staff of the DIP have focused primarily on providing investigators with mechanisms that would aid in the development of new technologies, an area that has increased in support by the NIH.
This is being accomplished through a Program Announcement entitled "Exploratory/Developmental Grants For Diagnostic Cancer Imaging".
This opportunity will soon be joined with a new NCI-wide initiative utilizing a model based on the Small Business Innovative Research (SBIR) program.
This mechanism will combine a relatively limited exploratory phase for technology development, with a much more extensive development phase should the initial results prove promising.
Ms. Northup: How much coordination do you have with the private sector in developing new technologies?
Dr. Klausner: The NCI continues to pursue productive interactions with representatives of the technology development industry.
In 1996, a task force was convened to explore the potential for partnerships between academia, industry, and government.
This meeting addressed the different roles that industry and the NCI play during the process of technology development, and recommended ways to improve these cooperative efforts.
The NCI has also recently entered into a dialogue with the National Electrical Manufacturers Association (NEMA), a group representing many of the industries developing diagnostic imaging technologies.
This dialogue has resulted in the formation of the NCI-NEMA Coordinating Committee.
This committee will meet on a regular basis to discuss the challenges facing technology development, and in particular to discuss how both the NCI and industry can interact more effectively to ensure that important technologies are pursued with efficient use of time, effort and funds.
TOBACCO ASSIST PROGRAM
Ms. Northup: I know the ASSIST program has been successful in many of the state which are participating.
What is the coordination between the ASSIST program, SAMSHA's enforcement of the Synar Amendment, CDC efforts, and work done by the Food and Drug Administration?
Dr. Klausner: The American Stop Smoking Intervention Study (ASSIST) is a collaborative project of the American Cancer Society and the National Cancer Institute.
ASSIST is assessing the impact of comprehensive tobacco control programs by providing resources to health departments in 17 states.
Through ASSIST and other initiatives, the NCI has a long history of collaboration with CDC, SAMSHA, and FDA.
Multiple staff from these four agencies have been working together in the development and management of their programs for many years.
In the field of tobacco use prevention, the topic that has required the closest coordination among these agencies is the illegal sale of tobacco to minors.
All ASSIST states have made this topic a priority for their interventions.
Throughout the project, many ASSIST states have conducted underage tobacco purchases as a method to increase community awareness of this problem.
These early educational experiences of the ASSIST states informed the implementation of regulatory efforts of the SAMSHA and the FDA.
In many states, the enforcement of these new regulations is carried out by agencies other than the state health department.
However, the experiences of health department staff have routinely been used to guide the regulatory efforts.
Other examples of coordination include the NCI/CDC joint support of the ASTHO tobacco network.
The Association of State and Territorial Health Officials tobacco network was established to disseminate new scientific information and experience in effective tobacco interventions to health departments in all 50 states.
Through this network, CDC and NCI provide consistent information to tobacco control programs in all the states.
Another example of coordination is an annual national conference on tobacco prevention and control techniques.
NCI, CDC, SAMSHA, and FDA participate in this conference, with the co-sponsorship of ten private organizations.
Tobacco control professionals from the entire nation attend the conference, in which new topics in the field are presented, including the new activities of the federal agencies.
Ms. Northup: What have we learned from the ASSIST program?
Dr. Klausner: The ASSIST project was established to test the effectiveness of state-wide, comprehensive tobacco control programs.
ASSIST interventions have been implemented since 1993, and a complete assessment of their impact will not be available until the final evaluation is completed in the year 2000.
However, the mid-point assessment of cigarette consumption in ASSIST states is encouraging.
Data published this month indicate that ASSIST states as a group were consuming cigarettes at the same rate as the other states prior to the intervention period.
At mid-point of the intervention, however, ASSIST states were consuming 7% fewer cigarettes per capita.
This difference is statistically significant, and it suggests that the comprehensive programs are indeed effective in reducing smoking rates.
In addition to the data on smoking, the ASSIST project has provided the remaining states with extensive information and experience in establishing and conducting effective tobacco control programs.
This experience shows that state and community coalitions, based on public/private partnerships, can implement effective tobacco control interventions.
ASSIST has also served as a model by providing extensive training in tobacco control techniques to thousands of public health professionals.
This training has been instrumental in the implementation of effective programs.
PATIENT ACCESS TO CLINICAL TRIALS
Ms. Northup: Your budget mentions the need to develop an infrastructure to eliminate the barriers for physicians and patients to learn about clinical trials.
How is that issue addressed currently - - how do physicians and patients become involved in clinical trials?
Dr. Klausner: There are many ways in which patients and physicians become involved in clinical trials.
However, there also are a number of barriers such as the lack of insurance coverage for investigational therapy, lack of public information about the value of clinical trials, difficulty in finding information about clinical trials, including what studies are available and where they are being conducted, and limited clinical trials information that is targeted to the needs of particular groups and individuals.
The NCI is aggressively addressing all these barriers through the following major initiatives intended to assure patient and physician involvement in clinical trials.
In order to assure increased access to clinical trials through coverage for the patient care costs associated with these studies, the NCI has entered into clinical trials agreements with the Department of Defense, the Department of Veterans' Affairs, and is pursing initiatives with private payers.
In addition, NCI is working with Health Care Finance Administration (HCFA) to develop the Medicare clinical trials demonstration.
The need to inform the public about the types of clinical trials is being addressed in a number of ways.
A clinical trials WEB site (http://cancertrials.nci.nih.gov/) has just been developed and will serve as the place for accurate information about clinical trials.
It will have educational information about clinical trials in general and will link to the specific trials in Physician Desk Query (PDQ).
This site will involve the participation of advocate organizations and oncology health professionals and will be publicized widely.
The NCI is also in the process of developing a large, integrated strategy to "market" clinical trials to the public.
This effort will be a collaborative effort with the many groups concerned with cancer clinical trials.
To address the issue of making NCI information more accessible to all citizens and to provide it in a manner relevant to the particular individual, the NCI held a Clinical Trials Information System Design meeting in March that included 190 participants.
The purpose of the meeting was to conduct a needs assessment to determine how each user group needs cancer information presented, accessed and communicated.
A list of formal recommendations is being developed by the meeting steering committee to be presented to the NCI for review and implementation.
As the personal voice of the NCI, the Cancer Information Service is in the process of updating their computer and phone systems to better serve the public by providing individualized cancer clinical trial information.
To maximize the integration of the many clinical trial promotion initiatives across the NCI, there has been an Office of Clinical Research Promotion created in the Office of the Director.
Ms. Northup: How will this change if you are provided the increase in funding which has been requested?
Dr. Klausner: Increased funding requested in the Budget will help assure that NCI has the ability to implement and sustain these important initiatives and assure access to and participation in clinical trials.
INVESTIGATOR-INITIATED RESEARCH
Ms. Northup: Currently, what is the percentage of investigator-initiated research (give breakdown)?
Dr. Klausner: For FY 1998, NCI estimates that it will, in total, fund over 3,600 research project grants.
Of this total number, NCI estimates that it will fund over 980 competing research project grants for a 28% success rate, and will fund over 2,620 non-competing awards.
Ms. Northup: How will this change (by how much will it increase) if you are funded at the levels proposed by the Administration?
Dr. Klausner: For FY 1999, NCI estimates that it will fund, in total, over 3,900 research project grants.
Of this number, NCI estimates that it will fund over 1,100 competing research project grants for a 13% increase in the number of competing awards funded, and a 30% success rate.
This also includes over 2,800 non-competing awards.
CHILDREN AND CANCER
Ms. Northup: This Subcommittee has discussed the sensitive nature of the child, and how the immaturity of a child's system may have an effect on how it is treated by disease.
Do cancer cells behave the same way in a child as an adult?
Dr. Klausner: The cancers of children are similar to those of adults in that most are invasive and will eventually cause death if adequate treatment is not provided.
However, the specific types of cancers that occur in children and adolescents (e.g., neuroblastoma, retinoblastoma, rhabdomyosarcoma) occur rarely in adults, and conversely, the common forms of adult cancers (e.g., breast, lung, colon) are extremely uncommon in children.
Even the leukemias that occur in both adults and children and that look the same when examined under a microscope are often different at the molecular level and have markedly different clinical behaviors.
These differences speak to the critical need for studies directed specifically towards the cancers of children.
The past decade has provided remarkable progress in understanding the unique molecular characteristics of the different types of cancers that occur in children, as evidenced by the numbers of genes now associated with specific childhood cancers.
A partial listing of the genes associated with solid tumors that occur in children is provided in the table below.
An even larger number of genes has been identified that are associated with childhood leukemia.
Tumor Genes Involved (Chromosomal location) Neuroblastoma MYC-N (Chromosome 2p23-24)
Unidentified gene(s) at Chromosome 1p36 Rhabdomyosarcoma PAX3 (Chromosome 2q35)
FKHR (Chromosome 13q14)
PAX7 (Chromosome 1p36)
Unidentified gene(s) at Chromosome 11p15 Ewing's sarcoma EWS (Chromosome 11q24)
FLI (Chromosome 22q12) Desmoplastic small round cell sarcoma EWS (Chromosome 11q24)
WT1 (Chromosome 11p13) Osteosarcoma p53 (Chromosome 17p13)
mdm2 (Chromosome 12q13-14) Retinoblastoma Rb (Chromosome 13q14) Wilms' tumor WT1 (Chromosome 11p13)
Unidentified gene(s) at Chromosome 11p15
Identification of the genes associated with the cancers of children and identification of the mechanisms by which these genes cause childhood cancers are essential steps in understanding the etiology of the cancers of children and in developing new approaches to the prevention and treatment of childhood cancers.
CHILDREN AND CANCER
Ms. Northup: Do treatments for cancer have different effects on children as they do on adults?
Dr. Klausner: There are numerous examples of how the treatment of childhood cancer differs from the treatment of adults.
In general, children tolerate therapy better and there are more diseases that are cured with combined modality approaches.
However, because of this, long-term toxicity considerations and second malignancies are more of a significant issue in the treatment of childhood cancer.
Finally, radiation therapy may cause more significant side-effects, particularly when considering radiation to the developing brain for brain tumors, and radiation to growing bones in Hodgkin's disease and various sarcomas.
Several specific illustrations are noted below.
1.
Radiation therapy of Hodgkin's Disease and Brain Tumors:
A notable difference between adults and young children is that in the treatment of early stage disease for young children, either chemotherapy alone or in combination with lower dose radiation therapy is given whereas in adults higher dose radiation therapy is given.
This is due to the fact that mantle radiation to a growing child leads to significant skeletal growth abnormalities that need to be avoided.
It has also been clearly shown that whole brain radiation therapy to children with CNS tumors leads to significant long term toxicity, which is most notably and tragically, the loss of IQ in young children who survive their brain tumors.
Therefore, the current approach to very young children (less than 2 years of age) is to postpone the use of radiation for as long as possible.
2.
Antrhacycline Use:
While cardiac toxicity is seen in both children and adults treated with anthracycline chemotherapy, late-occurrence cardiac toxicity is unique to children.
This is often manifested years later.
An unfortunately common example would be a child that has been cured of a malignancy before the age of ten, and then develops cardiac failure during pregnancy at age 28.
Thus long-term toxicities are a much larger problem in children when compared to adults and require longer follow-up studies to determine.
3.
Cytotoxic Therapy Use:
In general, children can be treated more aggressively with cytotoxic therapy because their tolerance of toxicity is better than adults.
There are many examples of Phase I Maximum Tolerated Dose (MTD) determination being higher in children than adults.
However, there are also several well known examples of specific toxicities that occur with higher frequency in young children.
Examples would include the increased incidence of nephrotoxicity and Fanconi's syndrome in young children treated with Ifosfamide, and the increased incidence of pseudotumor cerebri in young children treated with all-trans retinoic acid.
Also, in recognition of the distinctive characteristics of the cancer cells of children compared to those of adults and in recognition of the different effects of cancer treatments on the developing child compared to the adult, the NCI has established a clinical trials program devoted exclusively to the needs of children with cancer.
Ms. Northup: If so, what are you doing specific to treatment of children?
Dr. Klausner: Specific components of this clinical research program devoted exclusively to the needs of children with cancer include: * Children's Cancer Group * Pediatric Oncology Group * National Wilms' Tumor Study Group * Intergroup Rhabdomyosarcoma Study Group * Phase I Consortium of the Children's Cancer Group * Phase I Consortium of the Pediatric Oncology Group
These various research programs involve over 200 institutions across the United States, and they provide children with cancer access to state-of-the-art clinical trials regardless of where they live.
In contrast to the situation for adults with cancer, a much higher percentage of children with cancer are entered onto NCI-supported clinical protocols.
In 1997, nearly 4000 children with cancer (representing almost one-half of all children diagnosed with cancer) were entered onto approximately 80 NCI-supported clinical trials.
Over 50 of these NCI-sponsored trials are Phase I and II studies and are the initial evaluations of new agents and new treatment approaches in children with cancer.
The remaining NCI-sponsored clinical trials are definitive phase III studies seeking to establish new standards of care for specific childhood cancers, including: acute lymphoblastic leukemia, acute myeloid leukemia, Hodgkin's disease, neuroblastoma, rhabdomyosarcoma, Ewing's sarcoma, osteosarcoma, Wilms' tumor, Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, medulloblastoma, and low-grade gliomas.
A critical measure of the childhood cancer program is the improved survival of children with cancer and the corresponding decrease in deaths from cancer.
The appended graph shows that childhood cancer mortality has declined steadily for the past 20 years.
Continuing this remarkable trend of decreasing mortality from childhood cancer will not be easy.
The cancers that cause deaths in children today are the most difficult to treat and new therapeutic strategies are needed.
Future progress will require additional understanding of the molecular causes of childhood cancers, treatment strategies that more specifically target the abnormalities present in the cancer cells, and sufficient resources to conduct the clinical trials required to test these new treatment approaches.
[childhood.gif]
CHILDREN AND CANCER
Ms. Northup: Earlier I mentioned the need for NCI to work on developing methods to help patients cope with their disease or predisposition to disease.
Have you done any studies regarding children coping with the effects of cancer?
Dr. Klausner: Advances in our understanding of how children cope with the effects of cancer have been hindered by the lack of appropriate assessment methods to be used in children at various stages of development.
Nevertheless, a few studies on the ways children cope have been initiated relatively recently.
For example, one project underway at Children's Hospital of Philadelphia is studying the prevalence of psychological sequelae in a population of childhood cancer surviviors, ages 8-18, and is just beginning to assess possible determinants of the differential psychiatric clinical courses in this pediatric oncology population.
Using the post-traumatic stress disorder framework to conceptualize the children's and parent's reaction to serious physical illness, the researchers ultimate goal is to design interventions to address post-traumatic strees disorder effects in survivors of childhood cancer.
An intervention has been designed to engage adolescents and is directed towards identifying and reducing specific symptoms of the disorder and focusing on ways in which memories and worries about cancer continue to impact on the family.
Another study is investigating the impact of cognitive and social processing on maternal distress associated with bone marrow transplantation in the treatment of pediatric cancer.
The decision to focus on mothers is based on the fact that they usually take primary responsibility for the pediatric cancer patient.
The mother's adjustment is also the most likely to affect the overall functioning of the family and, in particular, the child.
Furthermore, mothers have been found to manifest more distress related to their child's illness than other family members.
Another group of studies is assessing the late- and long-term effects of being treated for cancer during childhood.
The subjects are now adults, but the questions focus on the physiologic and psychologic toll taken by agressive cancer therapy that produced long-term survival.
Other studies are focused on ameliorating the toxic effects of chemotherapy in childhood, and exemplify NCI's increasing interest in preventing treatment-associated morbidity.
For example, enalapril is being evaluated to determine whether it can alleviate the cardiotoxic effects of anthracyclines administered to childhood cancer patients.
Other studies are focusing not only on long-term physiologic/toxicologic manifestations, but also on psychologic effects as well.
CANCER ADVOCACY
Ms. Northup: Each day I seen several people from different advocacy groups, including different cancer advocacy groups for breast cancer, prostate cancer, leukemia, etc.
What is your relationship with these groups, and what are their messages?
Dr. Klausner: National advocacy and voluntary organizations concerned about cancer are important constituents of the National Cancer Institute.
NCI's Office of Liaison Activities (OLA) helps strengthen NCI relationships with the cancer advocacy community, communicating and working with them as partners in pursuit of the common goals of cancer prevention, detection, treatment, and control.
As the central point of contact at NCI for these organizations, OLA provides information and assistance to advocates, responds to requests from advocates, interacts with and takes the "pulse" of the advocacy organizations, serves as a catalyst to link NCI programs with advocacy/voluntary groups and vice versa, and cooperates and collaborates in areas of mutual interest.
One of NCI's mechanisms for working with advocates is the newly-formed NCI Director's Consumer Liaison Group (DCLG).
The DCLG is a group of 15 consumer advocates who will meet several times a year to help establish mechanisms and criteria to identify appropriate consumer-advocates to serve on a variety of program and policy advisory committees, to serve as a primary forum for discussing important issues and concerns --e.g., informed consent and development of the Bypass Budget--, and to establish and maintain strong collaborations between NCI and the cancer advocacy community.
The DCLG is a landmark initiative that will bring together consumer advocates and scientists on a regular basis to address key issues in cancer research.
The charge to the DCLG is broad, and we will work together with its members to develop it.
National advocacy and voluntary organizations bring new demands for participating in and contributing to medical/scientific agendas.
They seek seats at decision-making tables where they can share their views and valuable perspectives.
Some of the key issues of concern among consumer advocates include: access to reliable, understandable cancer information; access to effective, quality cancer treatment --including clinical trials; increased rehabilitation, psychosocial support, and other survivor issues; increased involvement of the advocacy community in setting research priorities and building an understanding of what advocates can contribute in the scientific arena; improved technology for cancer prevention, detection, and screening, and education of the public about healthy behaviors in these areas that would lead to economic and health benefits for all; concerns about legal issues such as patient privacy and confidentiality, implications of genetic testing, job discrimination, and loss of insurance; and adequate supportive services for children with cancer.
Ms. Northup: When taking into consideration which projects to initiate or fund, do you use the information from these groups and the levels of incidence to make such decisions?
Dr. Klausner: Priority setting at the NCI is necessary because there are more mission-related things that could and should be done than there are resources available to do them.
Priority setting is a phrase that is shorthand for an elaborate application of principles and mechanisms that the NCI uses for evaluation and judgment leading to the making of choices.
These choices are complex and difficult.
The NCI, like all of the NIH, has an obligation to respond to public health needs, as judged by the incidence, severity, and cost of specific disorders.
Calculating these needs is difficult, and there is not always a clear correlation between funds expended and results.
A very fundamental feature of setting priorities involves communication between the NCI and the larger community of cancer researchers, cancer care providers, cancer patients, and cancer survivors.
The NCI continues to make a concerted effort to enhance these links of communication that are viewed as vital to its mission.
The NCI employs a variety of internal and external advisory and review groups to ensure that the programs and initiatives of the NCI operate comprehensively and efficiently to fulfill that mission.
Recently, the NCI has conducted an inventory of its advisory committees and planning/oversight groups asking the specific question of which of said groups or subgroups include participation by consumers.
Virtually all now involve consumer participants, and we are actively addressing the few that do not yet have such participation.
The NCI Office of Liaison Activities was established to strengthen NCI relationships with cancer-related advocacy and voluntary organizations.
The Office has two goals: 1) to create and maintain ongoing communications and information exchange between the national cancer advocacy organizations and NCI; and 2) to cooperate and collaborate with these groups in areas of mutual interest.
The Office's activities include maintenance of communications systems between the NCI and the advocacy community; inviting participation in planning and program development; linking specific groups with the NCI programs and networks that best meet their needs; and facilitating cooperation between advocacy and voluntary organizations and the Institute in areas of mutual interest and concern.
A major activity of the past year has been the formation of the Director's Consumer Liaison Group.
The Office of Liaison Activities also coordinates annual meetings between the Director of the NCI and major scientific and professional organizations as well as with other Federal agencies.
The Director's Consumer Liaison Group (DCLG) consists of 15 consumer-advocates involved in cancer advocacy and/or voluntary organizations.
The DCLG will meet several times each year with the Director of the NCI to help develop and establish mechanisms for identifying appropriate consumer-advocates to serve on other key advisory bodies to the NCI.
The DCLG will also participate in discussion of the broad development of NCI programmatic and research priorities e.g., the development of the annual Bypass Budget.
The DCLG serves as a conduit for communication and facilitate the maintenance of a strong partnership between the NCI and the consumer-advocate community.
A significant part of NCI's responsibility as the focal point of the National Cancer Program involves priority setting, and in priority setting, the NCI seeks to make sure that every voice counts.
The NCI seeks to make informed, intelligent decisions regarding the use of its resources for the eradication of cancer and to articulate the product of its priority setting, such as in the annual Bypass Budget, in a way that is clear and accessible.
Priority setting decisions must remain driven primarily by the science that undergirds all aspects of cancer research.
The overall goal of NCI priority setting is to use the resources entrusted by the American people to their maximal benefit.
To accomplish this goal, the NCI is seeking to create an institution of science that is both stable and responsive.
Stability allows the NCI to plan for the longer-term future by maintaining a scientific infrastructure and helping to train the cancer researchers for tomorrow.
Responsiveness allows the NCI to take full advantage of what we have already learned to reduce the burden of cancer as quickly as possible and to seize scientific opportunities that are emerging with what can be breathtaking rapidity.
The balancing act that is at the heart of priority setting is far from trivial.
The questions related to cancer are complex, and the answers more elusive than anyone would like.
The NCI will continue to engage a diverse set of advisors and to weigh their advice with the seriousness that the problem of cancer demands.
Ms. Northup: It concerns me that those with the loudest voice may receive more attention than other cancers.
Can you give the Subcommittee assurances that the basis for your decision making is scientific?
Dr. Klausner: The very nature of science means that many significant advances occur when new findings, often unforeseen, expand experimental possibilities and open new pathways for the imagination.
It is also true that not all scientific problems are equally approachable irrespective of their importance to public health.
Pursuit of a rare form of cancer may often have unexpected benefits for more common forms.
The NCI's portfolio is intended to be large and diverse as are the mechanisms by which the portfolio is maintained.
The NCI applies stringent review for scientific quality on all research proposals in order to return the maximum possible on the public's investment in cancer research.
Because we cannot precisely predict discoveries or anticipate the opportunities fresh discoveries will produce, the NCI must support research along a broad frontier.
In keeping with this understanding of the nature of science, the NCI deploys its resources and talents to explore new areas and produce fresh results which prepare the way for the even newer explorations of the future.
The many disciplines that make up cancer research all contribute to our store of knowledge and to one another, and all deserve exploration and funding.
Discoveries that will increase our knowledge of the causes, progression, prevention and treatment of cancer may stem from epidemiological, clinical, behavioral, and molecular research, conducted by investigators building on the discoveries of their predecessors, including those in other fields.
Since it is impossible to know with certainty which area will produce the next important discovery, the community of science, of which the NCI is a part, has to be open to all ideas.
No one field has all the answers, and so no one field can be given all the resources.
This uncertainty of where the most valuable discovery lies makes the setting of priorities tremendously difficult.
But this uncertainty also fosters a creative and collaborative tension within the scientific community which imposes the discipline of evaluation, competition, and productivity on the choices made about priorities in spending public money.
Given the legitimate interests of the public, including advocacy and patient groups, the Congress, and other scientists, expenditures for medical research are always in public view.
Though clearly different from other purely business enterprises, science nonetheless has businesslike aspects.
All applications for NCI grants are subject to rigorous peer review and rated for merit.
Investigators are expected to define and justify the goals and budgets of their research with precision.
It is a striking characteristic of science that it requires both creativity and precision to generate ideas and results.
The precision with which investigators and administrators describe the targets and outcomes of research, however, cannot alter the inescapable truth that many of the results of research are unpredictable.
The Nation's cancer researchers represent the single most valuable resource of the cancer research program.
To foster creativity of this vital national resource and provide the freedom to pursue the best ideas that will yield progress against cancer, NCI offers researchers throughout the country the opportunity to compete for research project grants.
Collectively, these research project awards span the full range of basic, clinical, and population-based studies of cancer etiology, biology, prevention, detection, diagnosis, treatment, and control.
Priority setting is therefore a very dynamic process within the constraints of existing commitments and availability of resources.
The NCI depends upon the larger community to come up with their own ideas.
The cancer research community across the Nation produces proposals that then are reviewed for their quality and for their importance--in short, for what they can achieve in the fight against cancer.
When a new opportunity surfaces, the community of cancer researchers propose or initiate new ideas to close in on that opportunity to get definitive answers and, as importantly, to raise new questions.
While most of the NCI's funds support grant applications submitted by scientists working in universities, medical schools, other professional schools, and independent research centers on subjects they deem important, the NCI needs to make sure that all of the areas of cancer research are covered.
To accomplish this objective, there is a process within the NCI that is complementary to the purely investigator-initiated research grants described above.
NCI scientific program staff look at broad areas of science and identify areas of research where special emphasis is warranted.
The staff help identify scientific opportunities or techniques ripe for application by staying abreast of the scientific literature and attending conferences and meetings of professional societies where new basic and clinical findings are presented and debated.
If, for example, NCI staff scientists are convinced that a particular area of science offers opportunity, but extramural scientists are not generating research proposals in that area, the Institute may decide to organize a workshop or conference to identify specific scientific needs and opportunities, stimulate research applications, and attract scientists into the field.
Or if the Institute wants to encourage extramural scientists to apply their particular skills to a new challenge, NCI staff may generate a concept that will become a Program Announcement (PA), an ongoing request for applications in a broad area of interest, or a Request for Applications (RFA), a one-time request for applications addressing a specific scientific area.
Although only a small percentage of the NCI's funds is spent on research generated in response to RFAs and PAs, this modest investment has been a significant catalyst for scientific progress.
Funding is generally determined by the scientific merit of research applications as judged by peer review, and NCI is moving to include consumers in the peer review process.
Nonetheless, the NCI staff may determine that a particular area of research is of such great promise that funding needs to be provided even if the grant applications in this area do not have as high a relative rating as other applications.
These decisions, referred to as "exception funding" are made by the NCI Executive Committee based on a collective knowledge of the whole picture of the NCI's mission and programs.
Exception funding including Accelerated Executive Review represents about 12% of the NCI's competing grant pool.
NCI BYPASS VERSUS PRESIDENT'S BUDGET
Mr. Obey: I see that the bypass budget recommends $3.2 billion for NCI, compared to the $2.8 billion request in the President's Budget.
Review for the Committee the major research goals in the by-pass budget that will have the largest impact on cancer prevention, diagnosis and treatment in the next several years, and tell us what is the difference between these two proposed budget levels in terms of what would be accomplished?
Dr. Klausner: The President's Budget Request provides a very generous increase for the NCI and goes a long way toward funding the initiatives in the Bypass Budget.
In the FY 1999 Bypass Budget, the NCI identified research and clinical areas -- namely NCI's "Extraordinary Opportunities" and NCI's "Challenge" -- with exceptional potential to advance our knowledge of cancer and improve our ability to care for people with cancer and those at risk for developing the disease.
NCI's "Extraordinary Opportunities" grew out of an effort, begun in 1996, to systematically examine the field of cancer research to identify areas where focused efforts and increased resources could produce dramatic progress toward reducing the burden of cancer.
If pursued, these extraordinary opportunities in research promise to provide profound insights into how cancer develops, paving the way for new and improved techniques to prevent, detect, diagnose, and treat the disease.
In 1997, NCI identified four extraordinary opportunity areas for immediate investment.
The Institute plans to reassess investment in these areas after three years.
The goals for these areas are: * Cancer Genetics -- We know that the development of cancer is driven by genetic mutations; identifying traits of the responsible genes is the most direct and effective way to prevent, detect, diagnose and treat cancer.
Our goal is to identify in five years every major human gene that predisposes people to cancer; apply the knowledge we gain identifying genes to clinical practice to help people who are at risk; and deal with the psychosocial, ethical, and legal issues of inherited cancer susceptibility.
* Preclinical Models of Cancer -- Beyond identifying cancer genes, we must learn how genetic changes lead to cancer.
One way to do this is to introduce into preclinical models (animals and cell lines that closely parallel the features of human cancers and enable us to study cancer and test potential agents to prevent or treat the disease in a more effectively and timely manner) the same genetic mutations that drive the development of human cancers.
Animal models have been invaluable in our understanding of cancer, but we need to refine current models, create more effective ones, and distribute them widely to all researchers who need them in order to speed our pace of discovery.
* Imaging Technologies -- By applying emerging new technologies to medical imaging, we can achieve earlier and more accurate detection and diagnosis of many cancers, reduce invasive procedures, and improve monitoring of treatment response.
To accomplish this, we must develop techniques that will further increase the precision, accuracy, and scope of imaging diagnosis, coordinate the development of such techniques with medical need, create a system to evaluate new imaging technologies rapidly and effectively, and integrate imaging further into the practice of clinical oncology.
* Defining the Signatures of Cells -- Some tumors have distinct "signature" molecules circulating in the blood.
Identifying such "signatures" for all cancers will help us detect tumors earlier, and combining this information with our understanding of the molecular changes that are responsible for tumor development, we will be able to build a complete picture of tumor development.
This picture will help us diagnose cancer more precisely, predict a tumor's behavior and a patient's outcome, and select our treatment choices based on the molecular characteristics of a patient's tumor.
A significant "challenge" for NCI is converting our knowledge of cancer into advances in prevention and treatment on a scale that is needed to conquer cancer.
To meet such a challenge, NCI recognizes that we must create bridges among all components of the cancer research enterprise -- among all areas of research, between research and industry, and between the cancer research field and the American public.
These bridges will ensure that we close the gap between scientific discovery and cancer care.
To meet this challenge, NCI has developed a plan with seven critical elements: * National Clinical Trials Program -- We need to create a clinical trials program that tests the greatest number of new ideas about cancer prevention, detection, and treatment as quickly as possible, and ensures that all people who wish to participate in a clinical trial may do so.
Currently, about 300,000 people participate in clinical trials; NCI proposes that this program be strengthened and expanded to permit a five-fold increase in the number of participants over the next five-years.
Investigator-Initiated Research -- We need to fund the top 40 percent of grants in the Research Grant pool to ensure that excellent scientific ideas have the chance to be tested, and that new investigators are attracted to cancer research.
We need to double the number of Cooperative Agreements and competing Program Project (multi-institutional) grants to encourage collaborative research.
Support for Clinical Investigators -- We need to create and maintain an environment that supports clinical investigators by providing partial salary expenses for "protected" research time for selected investigators at most of NCI's cancer centers.
Cancer Centers -- We need to expand the Cancer Centers' Program -- a vital contributor to cancer research and care -- over the next few years to include more institutions.
And, we need to broaden the Program's scope to include smaller organizational units that can respond efficiently to highly specialized areas of opportunity, and perform the translational research that will move laboratory findings into clinical testing.
Informatics and Information Flow -- We need to develop a Cancer Informatics Infrastructure that will enable patients, families, at-risk individuals, and physicians to learn quickly and easily about available clinical trials, and facilitate information exchange among researchers, clinicians, and the public.
Studying Emerging Trends in Cancer -- For more than 20 years, NCI's Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results (SEER) database has been a key monitor of emerging trends in cancer incidence, survival, and death.
We now must ensure that SEER not only tracks such information accurately, but also contains information that will enable researchers to generate hypotheses and answer questions about the basis of observed changes in trends over time.
Training and Education -- We must take steps now to ensure that the brightest, most creative young people from every segment of the American population enter the cancer field.
We must convince some of them that the field of translational research offers tremendous challenges and rewards.
The President's request of $2.8 billion provides a very generous increase for the NCI and will permit the NCI to take advantage of many of the opportunities described above and contained within the Bypass Budget request.
The NCI would be able to initiate many of the highest priorities and investments but at a scaled back level.
CAUSES OF CANCER -- PERCENTAGE OF CANCER CASES
Mr. Obey: Provide a breakdown of cancer causes as a percentage of total cancer cases.
Dr. Klausner: It has been estimated that perhaps 75 to 80% of all cancer in the United States is due, at least partly, to environmental factors and is therefore potentially avoidable.
The importance of environmental exposures, including lifestyle factors, is reflected in the international variation in cancer incidence, the changing rates in migrant populations, and analytical studies that have linked specific exposures to cancer risk.
In 1994, the President's Cancer Panel of the National Cancer Program hosted a conference on Avoidable Causes of Cancer.
The conference reviewed what is known about specific causes of cancer, suggested leads for further etiologic research, and discussed strategies for prevention.
The National Cancer Institute has not developed estimates of cancer causes as a percentage of total cancer cases.
However, in a report prepared for the Office of Technology Assessment, Doll and Peto estimated avoidable risks of cancer in the United States.
Although their report was published 17 years ago, the estimates still appear reasonable, including dietary factors (35%) and tobacco use (30%), infection (10%), reproductive factors (7%), occupation (4%), alcohol (3%), radiation and other geophysical factors (3%), and pollution (2%).
The estimate for some risk factors, for example smoking, are based on much stronger evidence than for others, like diet and pollution.
The role of genetic susceptibility is also important in assessing cancer risks from various causes.
It is likely that the rare major cancer genes account for about 5% of the cancer burden.
However, the more common gene variations -- polymorphisms -- that affect cancer susceptibility associated with environmental exposures may have a much larger impact, because of their greater prevalence in the general population.
Further research in cancer genetics will be critical in gaining a better understanding of the importance played by gene-environment interactions in the etiology of cancer.
CANCER PRIMARY PREVENTION
Mr. Obey: Provide a breakdown of NCI cancer prevention funding by categories such as smoking, nutrition, occupational exposures, environmental exposures, etc., where prevention is the primary, not incidental, purpose of the grant.
Dr. Klausner: In FY 1997 NCI funded over $480 million in primary prevention research activities.
These included efforts to directly prevent and/or inhibit malignant transformation, to identify, characterize, and manipulate factors that might be effective in achieving that inhibition and attempts to promote preventative measures.
Almost 50% of the primary prevention research funding was directed towards environmental exposures, 19% was directed towards nutrition research, 14% involved smoking and 2% was related to occupational exposures.
Using a broad-based definition of prevention research including risk factors of cancer encompassing epidemiology, causation and carcinogenesis, the proportion allocated to prevention is approximately 38 percent.
By comparison, treatment accounts for approximately 35 percent of the NCI budget.
It must be pointed out that there has been a steady rise in the allocations for prevention and control -- an increase of over 121 percent from 1993 to 1997.
As the science of prevention develops, the institute has redistributed it's budget to support the science and the opportunities its presents.
We continue to monitor the science in the hope of capitalizing on emerging opportunities and we do this with the help of a number of external advisory committees.
In fact, there are several expert internal and external combined committees that are developing implementation plans based on the recommendations contained in the Cancer Prevention and Cancer Control Program Reviews.
Opportunities in cancer prevention are emerging and we anticipate fully to take advantage of those opportunities.
PREVENTION ACTIVITIES
Mr. Obey: What are your plans to expand prevention activities over the next five years under the President's proposed resource level?
Dr. Klausner: There are several areas of prevention that are slated for expansion.
These include preclinical models of cancer, chemoprevention, early detection including the development of biological markers, nutrition and tobacco.
Specific examples include: 1) prevention trials in high-risk populations for validation and potential integration of novel prevention and detection strategies; 2) expanded development of preclinical models for chemoprevention; 3) expanded biorepositories and new access with appropriate consent for testing of molecular detection strategies; 4) development of new molecular markers for early detection; 5) expanded research on micro- and macro-nutrients and mechanisms of action; and 6) research on biobehavioral mechanisms particularly as they relate to tobacco use and diet.
The plans for expansion are directly related to a series of external reviews of the cancer prevention and control program of NCI and the recommendations that arose from those reviews.
We are currently in the process of developing implementation plans and expect to have detailed plans by the Fall of 1998.
These plans, of course, are subject to review by our Board of Scientific Advisors and the National Cancer Advisory Board.
CANCER STATISTICS
Mr. Obey: Please provide historical data on the incidence, mortality and survival rates of cancer by type of cancer.
Dr. Klausner: NCI has historically collected all types of data concerning the incidence, mortality and survival rates of cancer by type of cancer.
This type of data is especially important in determining the correlation of select variables and cancer.
Attached there are a variety of tables listing your requested historical data.
Incidence and mortality rates are rates per 100,000 and are age-adjusted to the 1970 U.S.
Standard Million population.
The survival rates are 5-year relative survival rates and are expressed as percents.
For the tables: * pages one and two reflect the incidence per cancer site for all races * pages three and four reflect U.S. mortality per cancer site for all races * page five and six reflect the incidence per cancer site for Whites * pages seven and eight reflect U.S. mortality per cancer site for Whites * pages nine and ten reflect the incidence per cancer site for Blacks * pages eleven and twelve reflect U.S. mortality per cancer site for Blacks * page one reflects cancer survival by site for all races * page two reflects cancer survival by site for Whites * page three reflects cancer survival by site for Blacks
Another table has been added illustrate the changes in trends that have occurred for many of the cancer sites.
This table shows many declines in incidence and mortality in recent years, for all races as well as for individual ones.
[obey1.gif] [obey2.gif]
CANCER MORTALITY RATES
Mr. Obey: It has been suggested that the 3% decline in cancer mortality rates is based upon age-adjusting to the 1970 population, and that the decline is only 1% when rates are adjusted to the 1990 population.
Is this an accurate statement, if so, what is the significance of these two points of comparison in measuring our progress against cancer?
Dr. Klausner: The major points to be made concerning this issue are that no matter which age-adjustment standard is used: the mortality rates between 1991 and 1995 declined; the decline between 1991 and 1995 was statistically significant; and this decline came after an increase in cancer mortality observed over many years.
The original estimates were based on preliminary 1995 mortality data and population estimates.
Based on final 1995 mortality data and newer population estimates, the percent change between 1991 and 1995 is -2.48% based on age-adjustment to the 1970 standard million population.
If age-adjustment were based on the 1990 standard million, the percent change between 1991 and 1995 would be computed to be -1.84%.
The associated average annual percent declines were -0.58% and -0.42% for 1970 and 1990 age-adjustments, respectively and all of these figures were statistically significant.
Mr. Obey: What portion of the decline in cancer mortality rates is attributable to better treatments, and what portion is attributable to smoking cessation, early diagnosis and improved access to health care?
Dr. Klausner: The reasons for the decline are very complex.
The first step is to understand which cancers are driving the decline.
Death rates declined for four major cancers: male lung, female breast, prostate and colon/rectum.
For men, the decline in lung cancer mortality contributed approximately half of the overall decline and although we know that much of the decline in lung cancer mortality can be attributed to smoking cessation, the declines for the other sites are not as well understood.
For women, the small decline in cancer mortality was due primarily to the decline in breast cancer and to a lesser extent to a decline in colorectal cancer, but these declines were somewhat offset by an increase in female lung cancer mortality.
Current statistical research is in progress to assess whether reasonable estimates can be obtained for the relative contribution of change in mortality trends due to changes in risk factors, early detection and treatment.
Investigations aimed at understanding trends in prostate cancer mortality have been initiated.
For all cancers, the interrelationships among these factors using observational data make it difficult to dissect the changes in mortality rates for attribution among prevention, detection, diagnosis, treatment, and care.
The NCI is committed to research aimed toward continued improvement in all of these areas.
We believe that the encouraging trends in mortality rates are dependent upon research along a broad front.
PREVENTION
Mr. Obey: Citing statistics such as the increase in cancer mortality rates for the population over age 65, and the relative small gain in non-smoking related cancer mortality rates, some observers have recommended for several years a more dramatic shift of NCI resources to prevention research which may produce more dramatic improvements in incidence and mortality rates.
How do you respond to this recommendation investing more resources in preventing cancer and determining environmental and occupational causes of cancer, rather than focusing the vast majority of resources on diagnosis, treatment and cures for this disease?
Dr. Klausner: Scientific progress for the most part is built upon past investigations and knowledge and is dependent on discoveries from many directions.
As such the NCI has a responsibility to maintain a broad portfolio of research.
Funding must be spread across a broad spectrum as insights and leads emerge.
The proportion of the institute's budget that is devoted to prevention is dependent on one's definition of prevention.
Using a more restrictive definition, prevention approaches 20 percent of the 1998 budget.
With a broader definition that includes research regarding the risk factors of cancer including epidemiology, causation and carcinogenesis, the proportion allocated to prevention rises to approximately 38 percent.
It is easier to prevent cancers if we have identified their causes.
By comparison, treatment accounts for approximately 35 percent of the NCI budget.
It must be pointed out that there has been a steady rise in the allocations for prevention and control -- an increase of over 121 percent from 1993 to 1997.
As the science of prevention develops, the institute has redistributed it's budget to support the science.
We constantly monitor the science in the hope of capitalizing on emerging opportunities, and we do this with the help of a number of external advisory committees.
Opportunities in cancer prevention are emerging and we anticipate fully to take advantage of those opportunities.
While we agree that more funding for prevention is needed, it should not come at the expense of other research areas.
Prevention, detection, and treatment all depend on fundamental research into cancer causation, cancer risks, and cancer biology.
As a multidisciplinary research agency and the central research agency in the National Cancer Program, the NCI must invest broadly in research and application.
We must invest not only in prevention, early detection, and epidemiology, but also in treatment, rehabilitation, care of cancer survivors and the basic research that will provide the leads to move us forward.
CAUSES OF CANCER
Mr. Obey: Other than tobacco and exposure to sunlight, do you think the general public has been adequately informed about avoidable causes of cancer?
Dr. Klausner: The NCI and a number of other organizations, including the American Cancer Society (ACS) and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), have worked for years to inform the public about lifestyle choices that could increase or decrease the risk of cancer.
Information is made available through NCI's Cancer Information Service, through its web site, through public service announcements, through placement of articles in magazines and newspapers, and through distribution of millions of publications The programs have addressed the major habits or practices associated with cancer causation.
These include exposure to tobacco in all forms (particularly smoking cigarettes and chewing tobacco) and sunlight exposure.
Together, NCI and the CDC have anti-tobacco activities in every state.
NCI alone is spending nearly a $100 million on ASSIST, its large anti-tobacco program, over a seven-year period Another large-scale education program deals with diet -- eating a diet high in fiber and low in fat can reduce the risk of some kinds of cancer.
In recent years, the National Cancer Institute in partnership with the fruit and vegetable industry, has been conducting a major campaign to increase the number of Americans who eat five or more servings of fruits and vegetables a day.
NCI conducts national awareness campaigns costing between $500,000 and $1 million annually to take the "5 A Day" message to the public.
The NCI activities are complimented by industry advertising worth many millions a year plus educational activities in the produce departments of grocery stores all over the country.
In addition, when testing shows that chemicals cause cancer, NCI and other agencies, including the National Toxicology Program (NTP) and the International Agency for Research on Cancer (IARC), publicize the test results.
Mr. Obey: Should NCI develop a registry of avoidable carcinogens, and make this information widely available to the public through a broad public information campaign?
Dr. Klausner: Lists of avoidable carcinogens are already available from NTP and IARC and others -- for example, the state of California produces lists of human carcinogens -- but such lists have to be presented to the public in a context in which the public can understand the information.
For example, the public needs to know how exposure to a particular carcinogen might occur, and how to avoid or minimize such exposure.
The National Cancer Institute sponsors the national Cancer Information Service (1-800-4-CANCER).
This service can tell callers about avoidable carcinogens and its counselors can place that information in a context that allows the caller to use the information wisely.
Last year, the service took nearly 50,000 calls about a variety of carcinogens or risk factors -- diet, alcohol, asbestos, DES, food additives, environmental carcinogens, sun exposure, tobacco, radiation, heredity, hormone replacement therapy, etc. -- and was able to provide information about the substance in a way the caller could understand and use.
In addition, computer users entered NCI's web site for similar information.
For example, thousands of people used the web site for information about their exposure to radiation fallout from nuclear tests conducted in this country in the 1950s and 1960s.
The National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences (NIEHS ) also has a toll free number for the public to call if they have questions concerning health effects of environmental exposures.
The phone number is 800-643-4794.
TEN YEAR BUDGET MECHANISM
Mr. Obey: Provide a 10-year budget mechanism table that displays each budget activity as a percentage of the total budget.
Dr. Klausner: The NCI presents its budget to the Congress in two primary displays.
One is the traditional Budget Mechanism display that is crosscutting to all of the NIH research appropriations and includes the major mechanisms for funding, i.e. grants, contracts, and intramural research.
A second display that is unique to the NCI is its Program Budget Activity structure that organizes and presents the total NCI budget by a programmatic display rather than a funding mechanism.
The current programmatic display has been structured along three major activities: Research, Resource Development, and Cancer Prevention 
These groupings were developed after the passage of the National Cancer Act and reflect all of our research efforts categorized into major research areas.
For example, under the Research activity the four primary groupings are Cancer Causation Research, Detection 
This grouping represents the consolidation of both intramural research projects, research grants and R
Clearly, individuals can and will continue to debate what is the most appropriate classification or percent relevancy for a specific research project.
With the dramatic changes in the biomedical field there are many classification schemes that could be developed but I believe that the current one provides a reasonable grouping of the activities of the NCI, especially when one is looking over extended periods of time.
The Resource Development activity incorporates the three major areas including our network of Cancer Centers Support, the development and training of future cancer researchers, and Research Facilities' modernization or construction.
[obey17.gif]
NCI BUDGET FOR FY 1998 - FY 2003
Mr. Obey: During the hearing, you stated the NCI could effectively spend $5 billion by 2003.
Provide a budget mechanism table that shows how you would allocate this level of spending in 2003 compared to 1998.
Also provide the following for 1998 and 2003.
a) The number of competing, continuation and total grants.
b) The average success rate.
c) The average grant size and length of the award.
d) The number of research centers and average center award.
e) Any other quantitative or budgetary comparisons that indicate how the additional $2.5 billion would be spent compared to compared to existing resource levels.
Dr. Klausner: Mr. Obey, I do believe that the field of cancer research is poised to take advantage of the explosion in our knowledge of the cancer problem.
Often we see only incremental progress and it takes time to see the effect of research findings and applications.
For example, we have just reported some encouraging trends regarding cancer incidence, a drop in the overall cancer incidence rate since 1990 of about 0.7 percent per year.
Likewise death rates continue to decrease by 0.5 percent per year.
It is the fruits of the investments of the past that have led us to these current trends.
We have a long way to go but I believe we are on the right course and can effectively utilize the additional funds.
Clearly, the success and failures of our research will help us to make mid-course corrections as we learn more about cancer but I have indicated below the current approach to meeting this challenge and how the $5 billion budget would be allocated.
There are several tenets that underlie this allocations.
In order to achieve our ultimate goal of preventing or curing cancer, the NCI envisions a three-pronged approach.
The first is to sustain at full measure the proven research programs that have enabled us to come this far.
Each year, the efforts of thousands of scientists in the extramural and intramural communities yield scientific advances in cancer biology, risk, interventions, and control.
Our infrastructure supports all facets of cancer research and resource development including basic, translational, and clinical cancer research.
The second approach is to seize extraordinary opportunities to further progress brought about by our previous successes.
In 1996, NCI began a process of looking critically at the field of cancer research and identifying areas of discovery with exceptional promise for achieving pivotal advances both in our knowledge of cancer and in benefits for patients and those at risk for cancer.
We identified four Extraordinary Opportunities as being ripe for investment.
Our goals in these areas are: Cancer Genetics -- to identify within five years every major human gene predisposing to cancer; use the knowledge we gain as we identify these genes to help patients at risk; and deal with the psychosocial, ethical, and legal issues associated with inherited cancer susceptibility; Preclinical Models of Cancer -- to create animal models of human cancers; build the experimental foundation to use these models effectively; and develop the infrastructure and procedures needed to make these models available to all researchers; Imaging Technologies -- to discover and develop techniques that will further increase the precision, accuracy, and scope of imaging diagnosis; and integrate imaging further into the practice of clinical oncology; and Defining the Signatures of Cancer Cells -- to develop new methods for detecting tumors at their earliest stages, when the number of tumor cells is small and the chance for cure or control is greatest; to establish methods for detecting changes in cells that accompany and determine the development of cancer to enable the generation of new prevention strategies and tools; to create a new approach to accurate diagnosis that will allow us to tailor therapy to each distinct cancer and target a new generation of therapeutics to the particular changes that occur in the development of each cancer.
The third approach is to create and sustain mechanisms that will enable us to rapidly translate our findings from the laboratory into practical applications that will benefit everyone.
We need a research base that can bring the best of our developing knowledge -- the best ideas, technologies, and people -- to the problems of cancer prevention and care.
There are seven key areas that necessitate increased investment.
These are:
National Clinical Trials Program -- We need to create a clinical trials program that can test the most new ideas about prevention.
We need to ensure that all people who wish to participate in a clinical trial are able to do so.
This would include prevention, diagnostic, and treatment trials.
Investigator-Initiated Research -- We need to fund the top 35-40% of research grants at recommended levels to ensure that excellent ideas have the chance to be tested, whether they are in basic research, clinical research, or the translational research that links them, and that new investigators are attracted to cancer research.
This would include the expansion of Program Project (PO1) grant awards as well as the traditional RO1 award.
Support for Clinical Investigators -- We must create and maintain an environment that supports and encourages health care professionals who are involved in clinical research.
To this end the NCI would propose to provide partial salary support to the clinicians to encourage their active participation in an expanded cancer research environment.
Cancer Centers -- Restructuring and Expansion -- The Cancer Centers program should grow over the next few years to include about 75 institutions and broaden its scope to include smaller organizational units that can respond efficiently to highly specialized areas of opportunity, and perform the translational research so critical to move from laboratory insights to clinical testing.
National Repositories and Resources -- We must make repositories and resources readily available to investigators that need them.
Informatics and Information Flow -- We must develop a Cancer Informatics Infrastructure that will lower the barriers for patients, families, at-risk individuals, and physicians to learn about available clinical trials, and to create an infrastructure that facilitates information exchange among researchers, clinicians, and the public.
Studying Emerging Trends in Cancer -- We must ensure that the Surveillance Epidemiology and End Results (SEER) database not only tracks accurately changes in cancer incidence and survival, but also contains information that will enable researchers to generate hypotheses and answer questions about the basis of observed changes in trends over time.
Training and Education -- We must take steps now to ensure that some of the brightest, most creative young people from every segment of the American population enter the cancer field.
We must convince some of them that the field of translational research offers tremendous challenges and rewards.
Stipend levels would be increased over the five year period for the NRSA recipients as well initiation of innovative Career Awards and Cancer Education Programs both intramurally and extramurally.
Using the framework of the traditional NIH budget mechanism structure, an approximate $5 billion budget for the National Cancer Institute for FY 2003 is indicated below.
Budget Proposal for FY 2003 (in thousands) FY 1998 FY 2003 Increase Research Project Grants ..........
$1,223,765 $2,436,295 $1,212,530 Cancer Centers ......................
169,015 442,204 273,189 Clinical Cooperative Groups .....
89,960 334,667 244,707 Other Research Grants ...........
48,965 153,015 104,050 Training .....................................
46,619 98,571 51,952 R 
187,541 342,402 154,861 Intramural Research .................
421,925 593,548 171,623 Research Mgt. and Support .....
101,793 134,820 33,027 Cancer Prevention 
254,731 531,478 276,747 Construction ............................
3,000 28,000 25,000 Total NCI .....
2,547,314 5,095,000 2,547,686
The number of competing, continuation and total grants in FY 1998 is projected to be 1,360 competing awards, 2,801 on-going or non competing grants for a total of 4,161 Research Project Grants.
For FY 2003 comparable projections are 1,670 competing, 3,915 non competing for a total of 5,585 Research Project Grants.
This represents a success rate of 35-37% annually of competing applications coupled with an anticipated increase in applications over the 5 year period of approximately 17%.
The average size of a Research Project Grant would increase from the current approved recommended level of approximately $320 thousand to approximately $384 thousand, an increase of nearly 20% or 4 to 5% annually.
We would anticipate the length of the award to remain at an average of 4 years.
For Cancer Centers the current number of centers would be expanded by approximately one third for a total of 75 comprehensive, clinical, consortium and basic research centers.
The average award would increase from the current approximate $2.4 million to $3.8 million per center award.
ALTERNATIVE TREATMENTS
Ms. Pelosi: Dr. Klausner, what proportion of NCI funding is devoted to research or complementary therapies such as nutritional approaches, acupuncture, and herbal supplements? I am concerned that since private pharmaceuticals are unlikely to invest in trials of these kinds of therapies, they may remain unstudied unless NCI funds the trials.
Dr. Klausner: This is an area that is sometimes hard to classify, dependent on the definition and interpretation applied.
NCI staff recently analyzed our 1997 research portfolio utilizing an NIH Complementary and Alternative Medicine (CAM) Classification.
That checklist includes seven major categories of CAM -- Mind-Body Medicine; Alternative Medical Systems; Lifestyle 
Both the intramural and extramural research programs were included in this analysis that involved assigning a percent relevancy from 5-100% for each project.
Eighty four projects were identified with between 5% and 100% relevancy with a projected expenditure of $16.3 million.
The independent investigator initiated grant --R01-- and the Program project grant --P01 -- accounted for nearly 90% of the directly relevant CAM spending.
From the analysis, it would appear that the category Lifestyle 
More recently we took a second look at our extramural portfolio along with the NIH Office of Alternative Medicine and concluded that 15 extramural awards for $2.1 million qualified under a more stringent definition of alternative medicine.
Unless investigators are studying the efficacy or mechanisms of action of vitamins and minerals at orthomolecular doses, the grants wer considered to fall under the purview of dietary supplements and not alternative medicine.
Similarly, diet therapies were not considered alternative unless they were comprehensive and either incorporate the use of dietary supplements at orthomolecular levels or incorporate the use of non-regulated dietary supplements e.g., soy products and melatonin.
Behavioral interventions that are based on conventional behavioral/psychosocial paradigms and applied in conventional ways to address behavioral and social issues were not considered alternative medicine, even if the intervention is itself new and/or is being applied to a novel population.
The NCI has long considered alternative medicine claims of particular public relevance and acted on them.
Trials of laetrile, hydrazine, and Vitamin C were initiated in the 1980's.
In the early 1990's NCI initiated a "Best Case Series" approach to claims evaluation that retrospectively reviewed investigators' cases for evidence of tumor response.
The methods used conventional standards of assessing tumor response, and were limited by the fact that these studies were retrospective, and hence, information that may have been pertinent to the cases may not have been available.
Despite the limitations of this approach, however, a number of interventions were evaluated and evidence was sufficient to proceed with prospective trials of antineoplaston.
The NCI and the NIH's OAM are considering clinical trials involving shark cartilage and an alternative dietary therapy including pancreatic enzymes for pancreatic cancer.
The NCI was a co-sponsor of the NIH Consensus Development Conference on Acupuncture held November 3-5, 1997.
The objective of the conference on acupuncture was to provide health care providers, patients, and the general public with a responsible assessment of the use and effectiveness of acupuncture for a variety of conditions.
Participants included a non-Federal, nonadvocate, 12-member panel representing the fields of acupuncture, pain, psychology, psychiatry, physical medicine and rehabilitation, drug abuse, family practice, internal medicine, health policy, epidemiology, statistics, physiology, biophysics, and the public.
In addition, 25 experts from these same fields presented data to the panel and a conference audience of 1,200.
The Consensus Panel concluded there is clear evidence that needle acupuncture treatment is effective for postoperative and chemotherapy nausea and vomiting, nausea of pregnancy, and postoperative dental pain.
The primary sponsors of the conference were the NIH Office of Medical Applications of Research and the NIH Office of Alternative Medicine.
The NCI is currently revising its information on alternative medicine on its website.
With assistance from the NIH Office of Alternative Medicine, a new general statement on complementary and alternative medicines will soon be available.
This statement will be followed by new statements about individual complementary and alternative medicines.
The statements will be reviewed by the appropriate PDQ editorial board.
Clinical trials on alternative medicine are eligible for inclusion in the PDQ database of ongoing trials in a fashion indistinguishable from that used for listing of more conventional clinical trials.
NCI co-funds the University of Texas-Houston Center for Alternative Medicine (UT-CAM) that is dedicated to investigating the effectiveness of alternative medicines used for cancer prevention and control.
UT-CAM is one of ten Alternative Medicine Research centers established by the NIH Office of Alternative Medicine.
UT-CAM collaborates with the U.T. School of Public Health and the U.T.M.D.
Anderson Cancer Center to facilitate scientific investigations of Alternative Medicine.
The Center's mission is to: facilitate the scientific evaluations of biopharmacolgic and herbal therapies as well as innovative approaches; establish a national network of alternative medicine practitioners, conventional practitioners, and researchers; and support the use of critical evaluation skills among alternative medicine practitioners and researchers.
BREAST CANCER DUE TO EXPOSURE OF VINYL CHLORIDE
Ms. Pelosi: I have been informed that a 1977 study showed women who breathed vinyl chloride vapors on the job had elevated death rates from breast cancer.
In addition to occupational exposure, there are other routes of vinyl chloride exposure, through air currents that blow across hazardous waste sites that contain elevated levels of vinyl chloride and through contaminated groundwater.
Despite the 1977 study and the many routes of vinyl chloride exposure, it is my understanding that there has been no comprehensive study undertaken to examine vinyl chlorides' contribution to breast cancer.
Could you tell me if that is correct, and talk a little about what research there is in this area, and your plans for future research?
Dr. Klausner: Vinyl chloride is an established animal carcinogen, causing cancer of the liver, lung and mammary glands in several species.
In humans, epidemiologic studies conducted in the 1970s linked occupational exposures to vinyl chloride with an excess risk of hepatic angiosarcoma, and suggested excesses of tumors of the brain, lung, and lymphatic and hematopoietic system.
Since few women were exposed in the chemical plants studied, there was little information on breast cancer.
Only one study, which was of polyvinyl chloride fabricators in the United States, reported information on women, and this investigation noted a small excess of breast cancer - 44 deaths observed versus 32 expected.
However, information on established risk factors for breast cancer was not available, so it is not possible to attribute this excess to occupational exposure.
In recent years, the National Cancer Institute has expanded its efforts to improve our understanding of the possible role of a variety of occupational and environmental chemicals in the development of breast cancer.
These include a case-control study of breast cancer on Long Island and other areas in the Northeastern United States; a case-control study in Poland, where occupational and environmental exposures have been considerably heavier than in the United States; a prospective cohort study of over 30,000 women living on farms in Iowa and North Carolina with potential exposure to agricultural chemicals; and a prospective study of 75,000 women in Shanghai, where a large majority of them hold jobs outside the home.
Although the number of women exposed to vinyl chloride in these investigations will likely be very small, these studies will provide important information on the risk of breast cancer associated with a number of occupational and environmental exposures.
PSYCHOSOCIAL INTERVENTIONS
Ms. Pelosi: What proportion of NCI funding is devoted to research on psychosocial interventions?
Dr. Klausner: The NCI investment in Health and Behavior research in FY 1998 is $151.8 million.
The estimated FY 1999 amount is $160.9 million.
These amounts would include our efforts conducted through awards to extramural grantees as well as efforts conducted through contract and inhouse activities.
Ms. Pelosi: Could you tell us something about your current research in this area?
Dr. Klausner: Psychosocial research at the NCI is focusing on the short- and long-term effects of cancer diagnosis and treatment, and the functional impairment or disability which sometimes follows therapy.
Problems encompass both normal reactions to illness, such as fear and depression, as well as the psychosocial and behavioral consequences of therapy.
In addition, cultural backgrounds may impede patient adjustment by influencing individual perceptions of treatment and its effect on the body.
Behavioral and psychosocial aspects are critical elements in cancer rehabilitation in both the short and long term, and are complex issues requiring much further study.
Further, health care personnel currently have little information to help them identify patients who most need supportive services or counseling.
In recognition of these needs, NCI will be expanding research on the timing, content and structure of effective psychosocial support programs and launching a new research program on behavioral interventions.
As current health care practices emphasize disease prevention and early detection, many persons learn of their increased cancer risk through general medical risk assessments, from results of routine screening procedures, or when a relative is diagnosed with cancer.
Health care professionals are now recognizing the potential psychological impact and ethical implications of risk notification, particularly for cancers in which primary prevention strategies are yet unproved.
Indeed, knowledge of increased risk and fear of disease may lead persons to avoid early detection procedures NCI has recently launched a research initiative which addresses the role of counseling interventions in improving quality of life and enhancing adjustment to risk notification or diagnosis of cancer.
Funded grants are exploring the effectiveness and efficiency of counseling women at high risk for breast and cervix cancer and newly diagnosed patients with early stage breast or prostate cancer.
One of these programs of research focuses on the special problems of Native American women.
Recognition of the importance of quality of life (QOL) in cancer treatment decisions has led to incorporating QOL endpoints in clinical trials and use of QOL measures in evaluating supportive care practices.
However, lack of assessment methods sensitive to the needs of patients from diverse cultural backgrounds has limited their participation in clinical studies that include these measures.
To address the need for culturally sensitive assessment tools, NCI has expanded research efforts focused on the development or adaptation, validation, and pilot testing of techniques for measuring health-related QOL in cancer patients from culturally diverse backgrounds.
Funded research includes assessment tools for populations with limited literary skills and targeted culturally sensitive methods for QOL assessment among Hispanic American, African American and Hawaiian populations.
These methods will be applied to cancer prevention and treatment clinical trials and supportive care research to promote minority enrollment in clinical trials and allow cross-cultural comparisons of continuing care needs and treatment responses.
The impact of a cancer diagnosis frequently extends beyond the patient to touch all members of the family.
As the traditional system of inpatient cancer care changes to outpatient management, the emotional burden to family members is often augmented by new responsibilities for home care and decision making.
These stresses frequently intensify during active treatment or, as disease progresses, when cure is unlikely.
NCI is currently testing a variety of interventions, including psychosocial counseling, behavioral educational approaches, improving access to community health services, and developing innovative respite resources for family care givers.
To develop interventions of psychosocial support and medical and nursing care in the home setting, researchers are assessing the impact of different home-based care systems on patients and family members.
NCI investigators are developing methods to evaluate home care programs, community-based models of home care delivery, impact of home care on the daily lives of patients and care givers, and problems of home care in rural areas.
Researchers are also testing the effectiveness and cost of a home visitation program by a nurse "coach" on family functioning in cases of mothers diagnosed with early-stage breast cancer.
Another project addresses coping strategies used by couples in which one partner is a cancer patient.
Others are using psychosocial interventions to reduce the post-traumatic stress syndrome manifestations in children who have been treated for cancer and in their parents.
Advances in early detection and treatment of cancer have increased the number of long-term cancer survivors in the United States to approximately 7 million persons.
Many cancer survivors live with compromised daily functioning, including changes in endurance and strength, impaired reproductive capacity, and altered body image.
Others face complications that develop months or years after completing treatment.
The NCI, through its Office of Cancer Survivorship established in 1996, is supporting research that aims to decrease long-term physical and psychological morbidity of the cancer experience and enable long-term survivors to resume full and normal functioning in the remainder of life.
This area of research targets long-term impairment; self-image, sexuality, and reproductive potential; interpersonal relationships and social functioning -- with family, close friends, and broader social groups; vocational rehabilitation, employment, and insurability; medical uncertainties -- relapse, late complications, and second malignancies; and cultural and ethnic backgrounds that may influence adaptation to cancer.
MULTI-VALENT VACCINE AGAINST CANCER CAUSING STRAINS OF HPV
Mr. Porter: NCI has made a commitment to proceed with the development and testing of a multi-valent vaccine against cancer-causing strains of human papilloma virus (HPV).
This vaccine could prevent up to 80 percent of all cervical cancers.
How far away are we in developing this vaccine?
Dr. Klausner: An attractive vaccine candidate has been developed.
It is based on papillomavirus-like particles, which are ordered assemblages of the virus proteins that make up the outer surface of the virus.
The vaccine is likely to be safe, since it is not infectious and does not contain the potentially cancer causing viral genes.
Studies in animals have shown good protection from experimental infection by the corresponding animal papillomavirus.
Clinical grade particles for HPV16, which is causally associated with approximately 50% of cervical cancer, are in the final stages of preclinical evaluation.
Clinical trials are expected to begin in late spring or early summer in collaboration with NIAID and Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore.
Safety and immunogenicity studies are likely to take 1.5 years.
A subsequent NCI sponsored efficacy trial is being planned.
The first indications of efficacy should be obtained 2.0-3.0 years after initiation of the trial.
This trial will take place in Guantacaste, Costa Rica, the site of an ongoing NCI study of HPV and cervical neoplasia.
It is currently the NCI's plan to proceed with the development of a monovalent HPV16 vaccine.
This is the quickest way to evaluate the effectiveness of a virus-like particle-based vaccine in preventing genital tract infection by oncogenic HPVs.
Two large pharmaceutical companies have licensed the NCI's technology and have begun development of multi-valent vaccines.
Favorable results in our trial would encourage further development and commercialization of multi-valent vaccines.
Alternatively, if our results are discouraging, we will be able to turn as soon as possible to alternative vaccine strategies that are currently under development in several laboratories.
CANCER GENOME ANATOMY PROJECT
Mr. Porter: The Cancer Genome Anatomy Project is an ambitious project which attempts to identify all or almost all of the expressed genes in normal, precancerous, and malignant cells.
Would you describe this project and tell us what promise it holds for the future?
Dr. Klausner: The Cancer Genome Anatomy Project seeks to determine the profile of expressed genes in normal, precancerous, and malignant cells.
This information is providing an understanding of the genetic changes that take a cell from normalcy to cancer, thus, laying the foundation for the development of effective preventive, diagnostic, and treatment approaches.
The CGAP database accessible via the world wide web at www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/ncicgap provides the cancer research community with candidate genes that might be involved in the development of cancer.
The identification of these candidate genes is stimulating further research to assess their long-term usefulness as tools in the fight against cancer.
One goal of CGAP is the development of the Tumor Gene Index, a complete index of all genes expressed in normal, pre-cancer, and cancer cells.
Comparing the expressed genes of a cancer cell with that of a normal cell from the same body site provides significant insight into the changes that lead to malignancy.
This index is available to the entire research community and is intended to be a comprehensive resource that provides an unparalleled link between the molecular anatomy and pathology of cancer.
A second goal of CGAP is to support the development of new technologies that will enable the rapid, accurate analysis of the changes that occur during tumor development.
To date, the tumor gene index has involved the production of approximately 70 libraries from well-defined tissue sources.
These libraries arise from laser capture microdissection of tumor samples, as well as bulk tissue.
The cDNA libraries are being prepared at the NCI, the University of Iowa, and two private companies, while the DNA sequence analysis is being performed at Washington University in St. Louis.
To date, over 170,000 sequences have been entered in the CGAP public database representing more than 3,500 newly discovered genes and many thousands of new and unique sequences.
The approach of attempting gene discovery through highly defined and previously unsampled tissue sources is proving to be quite fertile with a high percent of the newly-identified sequences proving to be unique to the tissue source.
CGAP is intended to identify the molecular characteristics that distinguish one cancer from another in ways that will guide future approaches to the design and choice of effective interventions.
It will accelerate our ability to develop new markers for early detection and diagnosis of cancer, and provide us with the tools to unravel the interactions of genes with diet, hormones and the environment.
Inititally, CGAP is concentrating on five major cancers--breast, colon, lung, prostate, and ovarian cancers.
However, CGAP is designed to collect data for all cancers.
CGAP is designed to build an infrastructure of resources, information, and technologies to provide a platform for establishing an index of all genes expressed in tumors, and support development of new technologies to allow high throughput analysis of gene and protein expression as well as mutation detection.
A very high priority of the entire scientific community is to have available databases, and as clones, full-length expressed sequences.
NCI proposes to enhance the CGAP sequencing infrastructure to allow for 10,000 full insert (1.52 kilobases each on average) sequences in the next year.
Recommendations from both the Developmental Diagnostics Working Group of the NCI and the recent functional genomics workshop of the NHGRI placed this as a very high priority recommending 5X sequencing coverage for each clone.
An intramural group of the NCI in collaboration with the NCBI, and outside collaborators, have started exploring technological approaches for the discovery and validation of single nucleotide polymorphisms in genes identified in the NCI tumor index.
This project will compare various approaches to the discovery of single nucleotide polymorphisms and will create a standard database as a public repository for this information.
NCI also plans to use mouse tumor gene indexing to create models of tumor development in mice based on our knowledge of human cancer genes and use these models to study the biology of tumor development.
Understanding the early stages of tumor development will help us develop better tools for detection and diagnosis.
Also, these animal models will be particularly important for studying the complicated later stages of tumor spread and invasion, areas of research that deal with the most threatening aspects of human cancers.
In addition to these NCI funds, the National Center for Biotechnology Information - part of the National Library of Medicine - and the Department of Energy are participating in the development of CGAP.
Support for the project is also being provided by Bristol-Myers Squibb, Genentech, Glaxo Wellcome, and Merck.
Preparation of libraries and DNA sequencing are being performed at several academic centers and companies, and in time, even more will likely be involved.
R wp="br1"
PSA TESTING AS SCREENING
Mr. Porter: There is an ongoing debate over whether middle-aged men should be screened for prostate cancer, but more importantly whether the PSA test should be used as the screening test.
Will this project provide some new evidence into this debate?
Dr. Klausner: It is true that there is uncertainty in the medical community regarding whether there is net benefit or harm associated with screening all middle-aged men for prostate cancer by PSA or other methods.
PSA does detect prostate cancers in earlier developmental stages than is possible by traditional clinical methods.
This is one of the reasons why the NCI is interested in studying whether the resulting stage shift and earlier diagnosis leads to a decrease in prostate cancer mortality.
For some cancers --and chronic diseases in general -- earlier detection has led to decreased mortality, but for others it has not.
And there have been unintended harms associated with screening for a variety of diseases.
In the case of prostate cancer, it is possible that tumors are being detected by screening that would never have caused medical problems.
This is because of the very large reservoir of silent prostate cancers that appear to parallel the normal aging process in men.
Nevertheless, since we cannot reliably distinguish the life threatening cancers from those that would remain silent, many men are treated in the hopes of benefitting some.
Treatment, has attendant morbidity, including sexual impotence, urinary incontinence, and rectal injury.
NCI also has begun the Cancer Genome Anatomy Project (CGAP).
One goal of this project is the development of the Tumor Gene Index, a complete index of all genes expressed in normal, pre-cancer, and cancer cells.
Comparing the expressed genes of a cancer cell with that of a normal cell from the same body site provides significant insight into the changes that lead to malignancy.
This index is available to the cancer research community on the World Wide Web -- http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/ncicgap/ and is intended to be a comprehensive resource that provides an unparalleled link between the molecular anatomy and pathology of cancer.
A second goal of CGAP is to support the development of new technologies that will enable the rapid, accurate analysis of the changes that occur during tumor development.
CGAP is intended to identify the molecular characteristics that distinguish one cancer from another in ways that will guide future approaches to the design and choice of effective interventions.
It will accelerate our ability to develop new markers for early detection and diagnosis of cancer, and provide us with the tools to unravel the interactions of genes with diet, hormones and the environment.
Initially, CGAP in concentrating on five major cancers--breast, colon, lung, prostate, and ovarian cancers.
However, CGAP is designed to collect data for all cancers.
Currently, prostate cancer is the most highly represented cancer site in the CGAP database with 16 cDNA libraries, over 29,000 cDNA sequences, and 352 tissue-unique genes identified to date.
It is anticipated that CGAP will reveal new prostate cancer specific genes that could provide future diagnostic tests with higher specificity for aggressive prostate cancer.
NCI's ongoing Prostate, Lung, Colorectal, and Ovarian Cancer Screening Trial (PLCO) is assessing the efficacy of prostate cancer screening.
The PLCO Cancer Screening Trial and the other prostate cancer screening studies in Europe are being done in order to determine if screening decreases mortality and to determine the proportion of men receiving unnecessary treatment.
For prostate cancer, men will have a digital rectal exam and a blood test for PSA.
Special efforts are being made to enroll minority groups in this trial, including establishment of a new screening center, co-sponsored by the CDC, focusing on recruiting African Americans and two additional minority screening centers which will be added this year.
PATIENT ACCESS TO CLINICAL TRIALS
Mr. Porter: You have increased patient access to clinical trials through agreements with the Department of Defense and the Veterans Administration.
The President's proposal to establish a three year demonstration to cover patient care costs for Medicare beneficiaries who participate in NIH-sponsored cancer clinical trials will expand patient access even further.
Have you been involved with the drafting of the legislation needed to start this demonstration?
Dr. Klausner: The President's proposal to establish a three year demonstration to cover the patient care costs for medicare beneficiaries who participate in NCI-sponsored cancer clinical trials is an extremely important opportunity for patients.
We have been working with the staff at HCFA to develop and draft legislation for a demonstration that will offer broad patient access, track the clinical trials accrual in the demonstration, publicize this patient option to beneficiaries, and include an economic evaluation of the impact of this benefit on medicare.
ALTERNATIVE FUNDING SOURCES OTHER THAN TOBACCO LEGISLATION
Mr. Porter: The proposal would cost $750 million over three years and would be funded by receipts from tobacco legislation.
If tobacco legislation fails to get enacted, is the Administration looking at alternative funding sources?
Dr. Klausner: Like every other priority of the President, the Administration will work with the Congress to pay for these increases in spending.
We fully believe a comprehensive bipartisan legislative package on tobacco will be passed by the Congress, and that legislation will provide, among other things, the resources to pay for the proposed Medicare demonstrations for clinical trials.
Mr. Porter: How many additional patients will this proposal put into clinical trials?
Dr. Klausner: There is no way to accurately predict the number of additional patients participating in cancer clinical trials due to this demonstration project.
However, we anticipate the number to increase slowly over the first months as patients learn of this new benefit.
We then anticipate the numbers to increase steadily into the thousands over the three years of the demonstration.
Mr. Porter: What would an influx of patients like this into the system mean for cancer research?
Dr. Klausner: The anticipated increase of Medicare patients into the NCI clinical trials program will allow clinical researchers to conduct trials quickly, answer questions faster, thus, moving the cancer research field forward more rapidly.
In particular, it will also facilitate the answering of important research questions about cancer treatment in the elderly.
CLINICAL DATA UPDATE SYSTEM
Mr. Porter: You have been working on the creation of a single entry clinical data reporting system to make clinical trials more uniform and reduce the paperwork burden associated with these trials.
There is hope that this will save money, allow more participants in clinical trials, and establish optimal care.
What is the status of this initiative?
Dr. Klausner: To improve the efficiency of the clinical trials program and optimize patient care, the NCI is developing a standardized electronic clinical data reporting system, known as the Clinical Data Update System (CDUS).
Development of the CDUS has been a collaborative effort.
A variety of individuals with diverse backgrounds and skills -- e.g. clinicians, statisticians, nurses, pharmacists, systems analysts and computer programmers -- contributed to the development of the CDUS.
The participants represented the entire oncology community including the Cooperative Groups, Cancer Centers, pharmaceutical industry, FDA and the NCI.
The CDUS is being developed in three stages.
Stage I of the CDUS development involved establishing an electronic reporting mechanism to capture summary patient data.
Demographic data will be electronically downloaded from Cooperative Group or Cancer Center data bases and electronically "burst" over the internet to the NCI's File Transfer Protocol site.
Electronic capture of the information directly from the individual Cooperative Groups data bases eliminates double data entry, reduces errors and minimizes delays for data correction.
Electronic data capture will result in substantial savings in time and effort for both the Groups and the NCI.
Stage I is currently being piloted and full implementation will begin April 30, 1998.
Stage II of the CDUS development is somewhat more complex.
This stage involves the collection of additional clinically relevant data for phase I and II trials.
The CDUS collaborators have identified the minimal data set to meet the scientific, regulatory and administrative needs of the NCI.
Standardized terminology, definitions and coding are being finalized.
The electronic submission mechanism created for stage I of the CDUS will be expanded to capture the larger data set required for stage II.
In addition, a secure user-friendly Web based data entry system is also planned.
The Web-based data entry mechanism will eliminate the need for smaller institutions to develop programs which capture and or transfer CDUS data.
Phase II of the CDUS is in active development.
Full implementation of stage II will commence in late July.
Stage III is a longer range plan to integrate electronic medical records and protocol case report forms.
This will establish a true single point of data entry system.
Creation of standardized terminology, definitions and coding will provide a strong foundation for stage III development.
A substantial amount of additional work is still required.
Disease specific case report forms and standards must be established.
The NCI, in coordination with the FDA and the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries, must identify the minimal data set required for regulatory submissions, including Investigational New Drug Applications and New Drug Approvals.
The electronic infrastructure to support these wide-ranging activities must be established.
The NCI will sponsor a Medical Informatics Technology Fair later this year, involving public and private participants, to describe its systems developmental and to provide a forum to review the current state of medical informatics development and innovations in electronic medical records, systems and database development, nomenclature development and other relevant areas.
The goal of this fair is to share the advances in this field; create an awareness of the NCI's efforts in standards development; reduce the extensive duplicative efforts ongoing in many centers and companies; and establish effective public-private partnership collaborations in this endeavor.
The NCI anticipates 5 years until completion of stage III of the electronic reporting system for clinical trials.
PRESIDENT'S CANCER INITIATIVE
Mr. Porter: Before the President submitted his budget to Congress, he announced a $4.7 billion cancer initiative.
An initiative that will increase funding for cancer research at NIH by 65 percent over the next five years.
How much of the President's $1.15 billion increase in FY'99 for NIH will is to support this initiative?
Dr. Klausner: For FY 1999 nearly all of the NIH research components have efforts identified as cancer research.
Within the President's request for FY 1999 the total NIH effort in Cancer research is $3.205 billion which compares with the current year estimate of $2.914 billion, an increase of $291 million, or 10%.
Mr. Porter: How much is for the Cancer Institute?
Dr. Klausner: Of the NIH total increase for cancer research of $291 million, the NCI increase is nearly $215 million -- excluding AIDS funding -- an increase of about 9% over the current year.
FIGHT AGAINST CANCER
Mr. Porter: This is not the first time we have had a major effort in the fight against cancer.
How will this effort be different from the others?
Dr. Klausner: The fundamental answer to your question relates to the explosive growth in our knowledge about cancer.
More has been learned about cancer in the past two decades than in all the rest of human history.
We live in an era of astounding scientific discovery -- discovery that has given us dramatic new insights into the fundamental processes of cellular development, maintenance, and proliferation and how these processes can be corrupted to cause cancer.
Equally as important, we are finding new ways to apply what we have learned to prevent, detect, and treat cancer.
Our hard work has begun to bear tangible fruit: The Nation's death rate from cancer fell between 1991 and 1995 -- the first sustained decline since we began keeping records in the 1930s.
In human terms, this means that, this year alone, thanks to remarkable advances in cancer prevention, detection, and treatment, 10,000 to 15,000 men, women, and children with cancer who may not have survived 10 years ago now have a real chance at living long, full, and productive lives.
How can we build on the unprecedented successes of our recent accomplishments to reduce the burden of cancer, or even eliminate it from our lives?
First, we must sustain the proven research programs that have enabled us to come this far.
At the NCI, we have created an infrastructure that promotes discovery, attracted some of the best scientific minds to the cancer problem, and initiated ground-breaking programs that have yielded critical knowledge, improved patient care, and saved lives.
Our infrastructure supports basic, translational, and clinical cancer research, as well as investment in new research programs to address the needs of cancer patients and survivors, cancer centers, community-based clinical oncology programs and specialized programs of research excellence, training and education opportunities, and communicating research results to our constituents.
We must continue to offer these programs the full measure of our support.
At the same time, we must be quick to seize extraordinary opportunities to further progress brought about by our previous research successes.
In 1996, NCI began a process of looking critically at the field of cancer research and identifying areas of discovery with exceptional promise for achieving pivotal advances both in our knowledge of cancer and in benefits for patients and those at risk for cancer.
We identified four Extraordinary Opportunities as being ripe for investment -- Cancer Genetics, Preclinical Models of Cancer, Imaging Technologies, and Defining the Signatures of Cancer Cells for Detection and Diagnosis.
The science of cancer genetics will pursue the identification of every major human gene predisposing to cancer to enable scientists to help patients at risk.
This knowledge will provide insight to help individuals deal with the psychosocial, ethical, and legal issues associated with inherited cancer susceptibility.
The goal of developing preclinical models of cancer is to create animal models of human cancers.
These models will build the experimental foundation for cancer research.
NCI will develop the infrastructure and procedures needed to make these models available to all researchers.
Improved imaging technologies will integrate imaging further into the practice of clinical oncology.
The development of new imaging technologies will provide physicians the opportunity to further increase the precision, accuracy, and scope of cancer diagnosis.
By defining the signatures of cancer cells, physicians will have another tool for the early detection and diagnosis of cancer.
This avenue of scientific research will develop new methods for detecting tumors at their earliest stages, when the number of tumor cells is small and the chance for cure or control is greatest.
These methods for detecting changes in cells that accompany and determine the development of cancer will provide a generation of new prevention strategies and tools.
The creation of a new approach to accurate diagnosis will allow physicians to tailor therapy to each distinct cancer and target a new generation of therapeutics to the particular changes that occur in the development of each cancer.
We must ensure that the full promise of our research findings is realized by creating and sustaining mechanisms that will enable us to rapidly translate our findings from the laboratory into practical applications that will benefit everyone.
How will we convert our knowledge of cancer into advances in prevention and care on the scale that is needed to conquer cancer? To meet this challenge, we must have a research base that can bring the best of our developing knowledge -- the best ideas, technologies, and people -- to the problems of cancer prevention and care.
We need to create a National Clinical Trials Program that can test the newest ideas about prevention, detection and treatment of cancer in the shortest possible time.
We need to ensure that all people who wish to participate in a clinical trial are able to do so.
We must create and maintain an environment that supports and encourages health care professionals who are involved in clinical research.
We need to increase our funding of research grants to ensure that excellent ideas have the chance to be tested, whether they are in basic, clinical, or population research, or the translational research that links them.
We need to ensure that new investigators are attracted to cancer research.
We must take steps now to ensure that some of the brightest, most creative young people from every segment of the American population enter the cancer research field.
We must convince some of them that the field of translational research offers tremendous challenges and rewards.
The Cancer Centers program should expand over the next few years to increase the number of institutions and broaden its scope to include smaller organizational units that can respond efficiently to highly specialized areas of opportunity, and perform the translational research so critical to move from laboratory insights to clinical testing.
We are developing a Cancer Informatics Infrastructure that will lower the barriers for patients, families, at-risk individuals, and physicians to learn about available clinical trials, and to create an infrastructure that facilitates information exchange among researchers, clinicians, and the public.
The newly launched clinical trials web site - http://cancertrials.nci.nih.gov - provides physicians as well as patients comprehensive information regarding clinical trials using the Physician Desk Query (PDQ) database.
We will continue to study emerging trends in cancer by ensuring that the Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results (SEER) database not only tracks accurately changes in cancer incidence and survival, but also contains information that will enable researchers to generate hypotheses and answer questions about the basis of observed changes in trends over time.
We must take steps now to ensure that some of the brightest, most creative young people from every segment of the American population enter the cancer research field.
We must convince some of them that the field of translational research offers tremendous challenges and rewards.
Moreover, we need to persuade individuals from untapped segments of the research community to change direction and join us in these translational efforts.
This kind of research is often conducted by physician-scientists and other investigators who possess a broad base of knowledge and expertise in basic science, epidemiology, clinical oncology, and clinical investigation.
The training of such individuals takes many years.
Despite the scientific and medical rewards of careers in this area, there are also substantial disincentives.
Finally, it is time for us to focus additional attention on the needs of minority students and young scientists and to make these needs a major thrust of NCI's training activities.
DIRECTOR'S CONSUMER LIAISON GROUP
Mr. Porter: I was pleased to read about the formation of the NCI Director's Consumer Liaison Group.
This group is made up to 15 consumer advocates to help develop programs, help set research priorities, and find new ways to increase consumer representation at NCI.
I commend you on this effort.
The group's first meeting was supposed to take place in December.
Maybe you can just take a few minutes and tell us more about this.
How did the first meeting go?
Dr. Klausner: The first meeting was very successful.
This meeting was the first time that the members had an opportunity to meet each other face to face.
Discussions centered around topics of interest to them, as expressed in their nomination packages, as well as topics of interest to NCI.
These included informed consent in clinical trials and tissue retrieval and storage, redesign of NCI's Physicians Data Query database, the development of the Institute's Clinical Trials website, and finally a discussion on population and genetic studies.
The members have a vision that goes far beyond provincial concerns and they are very eager to have an interactive partnership with NCI.
Mr. Porter: What do you hope to accomplish? What does the group hope to accomplish? Etc.
Dr. Klausner: I expect that the Director's Consumer Liaison Group, DCLG, will not only provide a rich source of ideas and viewpoints for NCI, but it also will give the cancer advocacy community an opportunity to provide input in the planning of programs and our future directions.
I strongly believe that the communities NCI serves need to have a voice within the Institute.
In addition, NCI needs and indeed cannot afford to do without all sources of ideas, knowledge and wisdom that will assist it in making good decisions and to use in setting priorities.
For this reason, NCI hopes and expects that the DCLG will be a channel for consumers to voice their opinions and concerns and serve as a mechanism by which the NCI can obtain advice and feedback from the consumer community on a broad range of issues.
These issues range from clinical trials and cancer genetics to early detection and public information, and their number and complexity can be expected to grow as the pace of discovery continues to accelerate.
The DCLG members are very eager to work with NCI on a wide variety of issues.
For example, at the first meeting, they established three subcommittees to consider how the DCLG will help the Institute to resolve the issues discussed.
One subcommittee will help the DCLG to identify strategies to disseminate revised informed consent documents so that potential subjects can make informed decisions about whether to participate in clinical trials.
A second will help the Institute to educate consumer advocates about the privacy and confidentiality issues surrounding research in genetic epidemiology and tissue collection, storage, and retrieval.
The third is developing ways to communicate, in a two-way process, with the consumer advocacy community.
In addition, the members of the DCLG have asked for a wide variety of information to help them learn about the activities and research of the Institute and requested a formal, liaison role to NCI advisory boards such as the National Cancer Advisory Board.
ANGIOGENESIS
Mr. Porter: Angiogenesis is a process by which new blood vessels are formed to supply the tumor with nutrients allowing it to continue to grow and metastasize.
Last year you told the Subcommittee the NCI was looking at between 10 and 20 new agents that were being developed to either kill, clot, or prevent new blood vessel cells from growing.
Can you tell us where this research stands today?
Dr. Klausner: The table below lists 11 angiogenesis inhibitors or anti-vascular agents which are currently in clinical trials and indicates whether they are in early, Phase I and II, or late, Phase III, definitive trials which will establish their efficacy and potentially lead to FDA approval and more widespread use.
A number of other potentially important angiogenesis inhibitors, including angiostatin and endostatin, which are quite potent, should enter clinical trials during the next year.
DRUG MECHANISM PHASE OF CLINICAL TRIAL TNP-470 inhibits endothelial cell function or response Phase II Squalamine inhibits endothelial cell function or response Phase I Vitaxin inhibits endothelial cell function or response Phase I Thalidomide inhibits endothelial cell function or response Phase II RhuMab VEGF inhibits angiogenic factor activity Phase II SU5416 inhibits angiogenic factor activity Phase I Marimastat matrix metalloproteinase inhibitor Phase III pancreas, lung, gastric, breast, glioma Bay 12-9566 matrix metalloproteinase inhibitor Phase III lung, pancreas AG3340 matrix metalloproteinase inhibitor Phase I Col-3 matrix metalloproteinase inhibitor Phase I CM101 targets new blood vessels for destruction Phase I
Mr. Porter: How soon could this treatment be used in everyday practice?
Dr. Klausner: Inhibition of angiogenesis is a complex process and there are a large number of agents that interfere with aspects of angiogenesis and, therefore, may have a role in anti-tumor therapy.
However, the properties of these agents, including potency and specificity for tumor vessels, are very different.
For those reasons, some of these agents are likely to be much more effective than others, with less toxicity to normal tissues.
There are a number of currently available commercial agents which have some anti-angiogenesis activity, including certain steroids and hormonal agents, and interferons, however they are not very potent.
There are several other agents which are in late clinical trials and which could be FDA approved and available for everyday practice in the next two to five years if the ongoing clinical trials are positive.
These include agents such as Marimastat, a matrix metalloproteinase inhibitor, and thalidomide, a drug with multiple mechanisms, which has shown some activity in gliomas and Kaposi's sarcoma.
Unfortunately, many of the most promising angiogenesis inhibitors, including agents such as angiostatin, endostatin, avb3 blockers and VEGF inhibitors are only now entering clinical trials, so it is likely that they are approximately 5 years away from everyday practice.
CANCER CENTERS REVIEW GROUP REPORT
Mr. Porter: At the time of last year's hearing, NCI had just completed an extensive review of your cancer centers program.
What were its major findings?
Dr. Klausner: On the basis of the Cancer Centers Review Group Report in 1996, the NCI did not make any major changes in the fundamental purpose or mission of NCI cancer centers but it did modify its process to better achieve that mission.
The mission of providing the infrastructure for cancer research and facilitating multidisciplinary scientific collaborations remains the same for all centers; the NCI-designated Comprehensive Cancer Centers are expected to
sponsor outreach, education and information activities for the general public and for health care professionals.
The Program Review Group did identify the program's strengths, as well as opportunities for improved performance, and made several major recommendations regarding the designation, structure, function, and review of Cancer Centers and the distribution and use of Cancer Center funds.
The Program Review Group also proposed a greater role for Cancer Centers as key regional and national resources in the war against cancer.
Mr. Porter: Did it suggest changes in the number of centers, their mission, the way funding is allocated between centers, or organizational structure?
Dr. Klausner: The report did recommend ways in which the NCI could increase the flexibility of cancer centers to be more responsive to scientific opportunities, promote a more rigorous scientific review of the integration of the basic, clinical and population sciences that are required for the comprehensive designation, develop a more rigorous standard of funding cancer centers in order to avoid any perception of "entitlement', and promote the cancer centers concept more effectively to allow for growth in the Cancer Centers Program.
The NCI has formulated new guidelines for cancer centers and these guidelines have been in place for one year.
In addition, the NCI developed a more open system for encouraging planning grants to develop new cancer centers.
Since the 1996 report , the NCI has funded two new centers, expanded the number of comprehensive cancer centers from 26 to 31, and has attracted 10 new planning grants for peer review.
Currently, there are 57 NCI cancer centers and the NCI has projected that this number can be increased to around 70 in the next five years.
SPORE GRANTS
Mr. Porter: Your Institute funds a number of SPORE grants, which are center grants devoted to a specific cancer site like prostate or lung.
This program was started as an experiment by the NCI in 1992.
I understand you are currently in the process of requesting various scientific advisory groups to evaluate whether or not this investment has been successful.
When do you anticipate having an answer to this question?
Dr. Klausner: At the current time, the NCI Board of Scientific Advisors (BSA) is developing a rigorous set of evaluation standards for SPOREs, which currently focus on breast, prostate, lung and gastrointestinal cancers.
These standards should be completed at the June 1998 meeting of BSA, and some form of outside evaluation of the SPORE program will be completed in about two years.
Mr. Porter: What are your future plans for the SPORE mechanism?
Dr. Klausner: Initial perceptions are that the SPORE program has been functioning well and our expectations are that additional SPOREs would be possible.
However, we also want to determine whether other grant mechanisms could be equally successful in conducting translational research in specific cancer sites.
At this time, within the 1999 President's Budget, NCI has provided for a modest expansion of the SPORE program including in some sites of special interest (e.g., ovarian cancer).
Major modifications or expansion of the program will be in concert with the recommendations of the Board of Scientific Advisors.
PROGRESS REVIEW GROUPS
Mr. Porter: To help plan the future scientific direction for several site-specific research programs, NCI plans to establish Progress Review Groups.
Two groups have been established to date.
One focusing on breast cancer and the other on prostate cancer.
The goal of these groups is to help define the national research agenda for these cancers by summarizing current ongoing scientific activities and investigations and describing, in priority order, unaddressed scientific opportunities that need to be explored.
Who serves in these groups?
Dr. Klausner: To help plan future scientific directions for several of our large, site-specific research programs, NCI established Progress Review Groups,
or PRGs.
There are currently two PRGs -- Breast Cancer PRG and Prostate Cancer PRG. NCI is using the PRG mechanism to help define the national research agenda for breast and prostate cancer with a goal to develop a national plan summarizing current ongoing scientific activities and investigations, and describing, in priority order, unaddressed scientific opportunities that need to be explored.
Internal NCI Task Forces in Breast and Prostate Cancer are finalizing an analysis and summary of Breast and Prostate cancer research currently supported by the NCI.
Summaries of activities relating to each scientific question will address the significance, new opportunities, and gaps in the specific research area.
The final portfolio reviews by the PRGs, will provide quick reference to any aspect of the portfolio as well as the ability for more in depth examination of a specific topic.
The format will also allow for future updates of the portfolio report.
The PRGs consult with experts in various fields relating to cancer research to identify and assess the central scientific needs and opportunities in this area of study.
The group also will make use of a comprehensive analysis of NCI's current research portfolio, prepared by an internal NCI Task Force, and examine deliberations of previous groups and expert panels.
Members of the PRG meet on average, every month.
Within these meetings, they are defining a research agenda, using information gathered from the previous Roundtable deliberations, as well as additional expert testimony and other documentation as needed.
The group will compare and contrast the agenda priorities with the current NCI research portfolio and recommend a plan of action to ensure that research opportunities and needs will be met.
Actions recommended could include such things as shifts in areas of research emphasis, the development of new funding mechanisms, collaborations, resources and/or infrastructure support.
The PRGs will prepare a written report that describes findings and recommendations; this report will be released in early summer, 1998.
The PRGs are composed of prominent members of the scientific, industry, medical, and advocacy communities; currently, there are 21 members of the Prostate PRG and 32 members of the Breast PRG.
The PRGs' membership represents the full spectrum of scientific expertise required to develop the research agenda; members are encouraged to take a broad view in identifying scientific needs and opportunities that are critical to advancing the field of research.
To assist in their deliberations, PRG members also solicit input from other federal agencies and the research and advocacy communities through workshops, ad hoc groups and other means as appropriate.
In addition, roundtable meetings composed of over 100 physicians, researchers, and advocates were convened in 1997 to provide the Breast and Prostate PRGs with an intellectual framework of research areas, opportunities, and new ideas.
Mr. Porter: Are they looking at ongoing scientific activities and investigations being conducted in other countries as well as those being conducted domestically?
Dr. Klausner: Cancer is a worldwide problem.
Although the PRGs are not specifically charged with assessing the international research agenda, they are focused on the important research questions that need to be addressed to make progress against cancer.
The NCI has a number of ongoing studies and collaborations within the international community.
Examples of these collaborative efforts include: International Prostate Screening Trials Evaluation Group (IPSTEG); Hormone Related Cancers: Studies of Environmental and Genetic Risk Factors in Maryland, USA, Shanghai China, and Sweden; and The Alpha-Tocopherol, Beta-Carotene Cancer Prevention Study in Finland.
Mr. Porter: When can we expect the recommendations of these first two groups?
Dr. Klausner: Reports of the Breast and Prostate PRGs, describing the groups' findings and recommendations, will be available by early summer 1998.
Mr. Porter: How will this information be used?
Dr. Klausner: The PRGs' reports will be submitted for deliberation by the Advisory Committee to the Director (ACD), a group that advises and makes recommendations to the NCI Director and provides a mechanism for oversight and integration of various planning and advisory groups serving the broad programmatic and institutional objectives of the NCI.
Members of the ACD include the chairs and co-chairs of chartered NCI advisory committees -- the National Cancer Advisory Board, the Board of Scientific Counselors, and the Board of Scientific Advisors -- as well as representatives of the NCI and advocacy communities.
Following deliberation by the ACD, the report will be widely disseminated.
It is the NCI's intention to seriously consider all recommendations put forward by the PRGs, and to integrate them into the Institute's planning activities.
Mr. Porter: Is it your hope that this process will foster a more focused approach to cancer research?
Dr. Klausner: Yes.
The overall goal of the PRG process is to develop a national plan consisting of a description of current ongoing scientific activities and investigations and a description of additional, unaddressed scientific opportunities that should be undertaken in priority order in light of the current ongoing activities.
We believe that the identification of the significant scientific opportunities related to breast and prostate cancers will enable us to determine the optimal scientific direction to follow in these areas; this, in turn, might speed scientific progress.
PROSTATE AND BREAST CANCER PROGRESS REVIEW GROUPS
Mr. Porter: How and why did you decide to establish prostate and breast cancer groups as opposed to other kinds of cancers?
Dr. Klausner: Breast and prostate cancers are the most common cancers in women and men, respectively.
In 1998, an estimated 39,200 men will die of prostate cancer, and approximately 43,500 women will die of breast cancer; only lung cancer is responsible for more deaths from cancer, in both men and women.
Public interest in these cancers is high.
NCI has supported basic, clinical, and population-based research projects to elucidate the causes, biology, early detection, treatment and prevention of breast and prostate cancers.
This research effort has produced an enormous knowledge base about these tumors, and new data indicate that the application of research results is saving lives, as evidenced by the declining cancer mortality rates.
Yet the growing number of research needs and scientific opportunities requires that limited resources be used optimally.
As the PRG process was planned, NCI staff felt it was timely to undertake a review of NCI's breast and prostate cancer research portfolios and plan a research agenda for each disease that will allow NCI to move the research forward, toward the next century of progress, more rapidly.
Mr. Porter: Are you planning to establish additional groups?
Dr. Klausner: A comprehensive review of the NCI's portfolio of tobacco research has been initiated.
NCI is considering the establishment of PRGs for other cancer sites, but there are no concrete plans at this time.
TOBACCO CESSATION INITIATIVES
Mr. Porter: It states in the budget justification that the FY'99 budget request includes tobacco cessation initiatives in addition to those under the purview of the CDC.
Please describe these initiatives in further detail including requested funding levels.
Dr. Klausner: Our ability to prevent cancer depends on identifying, removing, and/or reversing the effects of specific causes of cancer.
Tobacco products are the leading cause of cancer deaths, and their established role in a number of cancers have made them a key target for prevention strategies.
Worldwide, smoking kills approximately three million people each year.
This statistic is all the more poignant in light of the fact that this risk factor can be avoided.
The NCI has a broad portfolio of tobacco research ranging from laboratory studies to community-based intervention research.
In FY99, NCI plans to fund approximately $91.2 million in tobacco-related research.
However, NCI staff have identified a number of critical areas of research that could be expanded if additional funds become available.
Results of these expanded research efforts could more rapidly inform the many new intervention programs currently being planned at the national, state, and local level.
Community-based intervention research, in particular, will inform the programs funded by the CDC through state health departments.
The NCI has a long history of collaboration with the CDC in tobacco control efforts, particularly at the state and community levels.
NCI staff have outlined a comprehensive tobacco control research program for the future.
Below are examples of research topics that need increased support:
Preventing nicotine addiction in youth.
New research is needed to expand our understanding of youth initiation of tobacco use and nicotine addiction.
A wide range of topics deserve investigation, from very basic behavioral mechanisms to applied testing of specific interventions.
Racial, cultural, and gender influences in youth tobacco use.
Studies must continue to investigate and make use of variations in the use of tobacco by different ethnic and cultural groups.
The role of gender in tobacco use initiation, cessation, and promotion requires further investigation.
The impact of new, proposed, and future tobacco product regulations.
A variety of new regulations have been suggested in discussions regarding comprehensive tobacco legislation, including a mandatory reduction in the nicotine content of cigarettes.
A variety of biological, behavioral, and public health studies can inform decision makers of the potential consequences of these regulatory proposals.
Policy interventions.
There is evidence that clean indoor air laws, excise tax increases, advertising restrictions, and youth access restrictions affect tobacco use.
Future studies will determine the most important features of these policies and their impact of different populations.
Comprehensive state tobacco control programs and their components.
Already established through the NCI's ASSIST program, research in this field will examine the effectiveness of state-wide programs in changing attitudes and behavior.
The relationships between individual elements of these programs and final outcomes will also be assessed.
Youth tobacco cessation programs.
Although many teenagers who use tobacco have tried to stop, most are unsuccessful.
Very little research has been conducted to guide interventions in this important field.
Cigar and smokeless tobacco use among youth and adults.
Research is needed regarding cigar use including, health consequences, advertising strategies, and cessation methods
Nicotine addiction and its treatment.
Clinical studies of new treatment regimens are needed.
Promising topics include pharmacological studies of nicotine delivery devices and other drugs, as well as the impact of a variety of behavioral interventions.
BARRIERS TO INFORMATION ON CLINICAL TRIALS BR wp="br1"
Mr. Porter: What are the barriers that exist in preventing patients, families, at-risk individuals, and physicians from learning about available clinical trials?
Dr. Klausner: There are numerous barriers that prevent patients from participating in cancer clinical trials including lack of insurance coverage for "investigational" therapy, lack of public information about the value of clinical trials, difficulty in finding information about clinical trials including what studies are available and where they are being conducted, and limited clinical trials information that is targeted to the needs of particular groups and individuals.
The NCI is aggressively addressing all these barriers through the following major initiatives.
In order to assure increased access to clinical trials through coverage for the patient care costs associated with these studies, the NCI has entered into clinical trials agreements with the Department of Defense, the Department of Veterans' Affairs, and is pursuing initiatives with private payers.
In addition, NCI is working with HCFA to develop the Medicare clinical trials demonstration.
The need to inform the public about the value of clinical trials is being addressed in a number of ways.
A clinical trials WEB site is being initiated this month and will serve as the place for accurate information about clinical trials.
It will have educational information about clinical trials in general and will link to the specific trials in PDQ.
This site will involve the participation of advocate organizations and oncology health professionals and will be publicized widely.
This site can be accessed at http://cancertrials.nci.nih.gov.
The NCI is also in the process of developing a large, integrated strategy to "market" clinical trials to the public.
This effort will be a collaborative effort with the many groups concerned with cancer clinical trials.
To address the issue of making NCI information more accessible to all citizens and to provide it in a manner relevant to the particular individual, the NCI held a Clinical Trials Information System Design meeting in March that included 190 participants.
The purpose of the meeting was to conduct a needs assessment to determine how each user group needs cancer information presented, accessed and communicated.
A list of formal recommendations is being developed by the meeting steering committee to be presented to the NCI for review and implementation.
As the personal voice of the NCI, the Cancer Information Service is in the process of updating their computer and phone systems to better serve the public by providing individualized cancer clinical trial information.
To maximize the integration of the many clinical trial promotion initiatives across the NCI, there has been an Office of Clinical Research Promotion developed in the Office of the Director.
CANCER CUBE
Mr. Porter: Describe in further detail the pilot project known as the "Cancer Cube".
What is it, how does it work, what will it accomplish.
Dr. Klausner: The Cancer Cube is a Complementary Collaborative Coalition (C^3) of active researchers who have, by mutual agreement, joined forces in an ongoing effort to better focus on the important scientific question of the role of estrogens acting as direct carcinogens via metabolites that cause mutations.
The Cancer Cube (C^3) Focus Group on Estrogen Carcinogenesis is concentrating on breast and prostate cancer and includes expertise in mechanisms of estrogen-induced cancer initiation, oxidative damage to DNA, breast and prostate cancer animal models, and metabolic activation and detoxification.
The research ranges from basic to clinical, and the goal is to achieve synergism in the overall effort by enhancing the individual research of the members through scientific collaborations and sharing of resources, techniques, and data.
The first exploration of the feasibility of the Cancer Cube^ concept occurred informally, in April 1996, when sixteen potential participants met together with NCI staff for an informal discussion of the ideas and a sharing of the expertise and interests of those attending.
Everyone in attendance was enthusiastic, and as a result, NCI organized the first formal meeting of the Cancer Cube in Bethesda, Maryland, on May 29-30, 1996.
This one-and-a-half day meeting began^ with a half-day symposium, with six speakers addressing the scientific questions and opportunities for research in^ estrogen carcinogenesis, followed by a meeting of the Cancer Cube members, who continued to explore and share^ their scientific areas of interest.
Three Co-Chairs were selected by^ the membership and a central focus was developed for the group's endeavors.
Now in its second year, the Cancer Cube is still clearly a "work in progress".
It meets twice a year, with NCI support, to share data and to reassess and/or fine tune the research.
The concept and the progress to date have generated great enthusiasm among its participants, and collaborative investigations are underway.
To broaden discussion and interaction with the scientific community, the NCI -- with significant input from the Cancer Cube -- held a major conference, "Estrogens as Endogenous Carcinogens in the Breast and Prostate", on March 16-17, 1998, which explored the role of endogenous estrogens in the etiology of human breast and prostate cancer.
At this meeting, an international group of scientists shared viewpoints to construct a more holistic understanding of the way estrogens can induce cancer, and to identify biomarkers useful for studies of cancer risk and for future development of preventive strategies.
The overview of the role of estrogens in cancer obtained from this symposium will be useful for scientists engaged in a variety of cancer-related studies, as well as for epidemiologists, health planners, journalists and members of advocacy groups for breast and other human cancers.
This topic was recently reviewed in Science, 279, 1631-33, 1998.
NCI expects this cooperative research approach to facilitate progress on complex questions by stimulating collaborative publications on new projects, generating new concepts that will move the field forward, developing new insights into human disease, and more rapidly translating this progress from experimental design to clinical application for prevention and intervention strategies.
Based on the success of the Cancer Cube and other NCI-supported collaborative research activities, the NCI is extending efforts to promote similar collaborative interdisciplinary approaches to other complex questions in cancer research.
A 3-year pilot program of grant supplements was initiated in FY 98 to support the development of new interactive groups of diverse investigators who will work together on new and novel approaches to complex questions in basic and translational cancer research.
Success of this expanded pilot program will be measured by increased numbers of new collaborative research projects and jointly authored publications and, most importantly, the generation of new insights into cancer and new concepts leading to improved prevention and intervention.
TRAINING AND FELLOWSHIPS
Mr. Porter: NCI distributes several training awards and fellowships.
How much was distributed in FY97 and what are the estimates for FY98?
Dr. Klausner: In fiscal year 1997 expenditures for training awards and fellowships totaled $76,305,000.
An estimated $81,047,000 will be distributed in fiscal year 1998.
These training awards and fellowships are used to provide support for promising scientists and research clinicians.
Objectives range from short courses, seminars, and hands-on experience for the continuing education of health care professionals, biomedical researchers, and the lay community; to comprehensive, integrated curricula and professional education programs within and between academic institutions intended to develop specialized scientific expertise of critical importance to the nation's cancer research effort.
These training programs are designed to foster the development of scientists for careers in cancer research, and to create and encourage cancer prevention curricula that will attract high-quality students and foster academic career development of young teacher-investigators.
Some support is also given to recently trained, highly qualified physician-researchers enabling their transition to independent research.
RESEARCH PROJECT GRANT POOL
Mr. Porter: Provide a list and brief description of the ten different types of individual awards used in the extramural Research Project Grant pool.
Dr. Klausner: NCI recognizes that one of the most valuable resources to be drawn upon in the fight against cancer is the wealth of scientific talent available in the U.S. and around the world.
NCI supports a wide range of institutions and scientific cancer research through its extramural funding mechanism.
This extramural funding mechanisms include a variety of grant types and awards.
Specifically, the Research Project Grant (RPG) pool includes the following extramural grant funding mechanisms:
--R01 Research Project (Traditional)
To support a discrete, specified, circumscribed project to be performed by the named investigator(s) in an area representing their specific interest and competencies.
It usually provides support to an institution, domestic or foreign, on behalf of a principal investigator.
Most of the research that NIH supports is maintained through this support mechanism.
Rarely, such a grant may be awarded directly to an individual.
--P01 Research Program Projects
For the support of a broadly based, multi disciplinary, often long-term research program that has a specific major objective or a basic theme.
A program project generally involves the organized efforts of relatively large groups, members of which are conducting research projects designed to elucidate the various aspects or components of this objective.
Each research project is usually under the leadership of an established investigator.
The grant can provide support for certain basic resources used by these groups in the program, including clinical components, the sharing of which facilitates the total research effort.
A program project is directed toward a range of problems having a central research focus, in contrast to the usually narrower thrust of the traditional research project.
Each project supported through this mechanism should contribute or be directly related to the common theme of the total research effort.
These scientifically meritorious projects should demonstrate an essential element of unity and interdependence; i.e., a system of research activities and projects directed toward a well-defined research program goal.
--R35 Outstanding Investigator Grants
To provide long-term support to encourage experienced investigators with an outstanding record of research productivity to embark on long-term projects of unusual potential in a categorical program area.
--R37 Method to Extend Research in Time (MERIT) Award
To provide long-term grant support to investigators whose research competence and productivity are distinctly superior and who are highly likely to continue to perform in an outstanding manner.
Investigators may not apply for a MERIT award.
Program staff and/or members of the cognizant National Advisory Council/Board will identify candidates for the MERIT award during the course of review of competing research grant application prepared and submitted in accordance with regular PHS requirements.
--U01 Research Project (Cooperative Agreements)
To support a discrete, specified, circumscribed project to be performed by the named investigator(s) in an area representing their specific interest and competencies.
--R29 First Independent Research Support and Transition (FIRST) Award
To provide a sufficient initial period of research support for newly independent biomedical investigators to develop their research capabilities and demonstrate the merit of their research ideas.
After extensive analysis, the NIH has decided to phase out this award and will no longer accept applications for R29s by June 1, 1998.
NIH is encouraging new investigators to apply for R01s which will allow the applicants more freedom and flexibility in identifying the funding level and period of support needed for the work they are planning.
During this time of phaseout, NIH will make every effort to ensure that new investigators are not disadvantaged and to accommodate their needs.
--Request for Applications - RFA
A formal statement which invites grant or cooperative agreement applications in a well-defined scientific area to accomplish specific program purposes and indicates the amount of funds set aside for the competition and/or the estimated number of awards to be made.
--R41 Small Business Technology Transfer (STTR) Grants - Phase I
To support cooperative R
Awards are made to small business concerns only.
--R42 Small Business Technology Transfer (STTR) Grants - Phase II
To support in-depth development of cooperative R
Awards are made to small business concerns only.
--R43 Small Business Innovation Research Grants (SBIR) - Phase I
To support projects, limited in time and amount, to establish the technical merit and feasibility of R
--R44 Small Business Innovation Research Grants (SBIR) - Phase II
To support in-depth development of R
--R03 Small Research Grants
To provide research support specifically limited in time and amount for studies in categorical program areas.
Small grants provide flexibility for initiating studies that are generally for preliminary short-term projects, and are nonrenewable.
--R21 Exploratory/Developmental Grants
To encourage the development of new research activities in categorical program areas.
Support generally is restricted in level of support and in time.
--R55 James A. Shannon Director's Award
To provide a limited award to investigators to further develop, test, and refine research techniques; perform secondary analysis of available data sets; test the feasibility of innovative and creative approaches; and conduct other discrete projects that can demonstrate their research capabilities and lend additional weight to their already meritorious applications.
INTERNATIONAL CANCER INFORMATION CENTER
Mr. Porter: Where is the International Cancer Information Center located?
Dr. Klausner: The NCI International Cancer Information Center (ICIC), which serves as the NCI's focal point for the collection and dissemination of scientific information regarding cancer screening, prevention, treatment, and supportive care, is currently located in Building 82 on the NIH campus in Bethesda, Maryland.
They will be moving soon to 6116 Executive Boulevard in Rockville, Maryland.
Within the organizational structure of NCI, ICIC is part of the newly constituted Office of Cancer Information, Communication and Education within the Office of the Director.
TRANS-NIH SPECIAL INITIATIVES
Mr. Porter: Almost 70 percent or $215 million of the FY99 NCI budget increase is directed to several trans-NIH special initiatives.
Provide a breakout of these initiatives including the NCI funding level.
Dr. Klausner: The NCI funding strategy links closely with the trans-NIH special initiatives for FY 1999.
As you stated, of the NCI budgetary increase of $215,161,000, nearly 70 percent or $148 million is identified with the NIH Areas of Emphasis and Infrastructure.
NCI is well prepared to undertake special initiatives within the NIH emphasis areas in part based on significant input and advice we have received from the entire Cancer research community.
They are actively involved in the planning, assessment and review of current operations as well as projected plans and programs.
In summary, the NCI has identified a number of initiatives within each of the NIH Emphasis Areas that we anticipate supporting with this budget increase.
Within the area of New Approaches to Pathogenesis, NCI would support projects to include developing mouse models to study the biology and treatment of human cancers since a significant impediment to the development of new cancer interventions is the absence of validated preclinical models for human cancers; expand efforts to Identify proteins secreted from tumor cells and develop sensitive Assays for Secreted Proteins; further activities to establish a Tumor Gene Index which will permit us catalog the genetic characteristics of tumors at each stage of growth; and using knowledge of non-mammalian genetic systems to the study of human cancer.
As each new cancer gene is discovered, we need to determine why its mutation can lead to cancer.
One approach to learning this is to study a relative of that human cancer gene in a model system where its normal role can be determined more easily.
Within the area of New Preventive Strategies Against Disease efforts would be implemented to expand cancer prevention trials and the number of patients under study particularly for prostate, breast, colon, and lung cancer prevention trials.
There are many more agents available for testing in cancer prevention, diagnosis, and treatment than the current system of clinical trials can evaluate.
This gap is expected to increase as the new wave of discoveries in cell biology and genetics advances.
Also, activities in furthering our understanding of basic biobehavorial research and social science research in cancer control would be implemented.
This initiative will include methods and measurement pertaining to use of new technologies, research design, data collection, and data analysis techniques; interactions of biological, psychological, and social mechanisms and processes in cancer-related health behavior, cancer etiology and progression; and development and refinement and behavioral theory appropriate for diverse populations, new health care technologies and changes in service delivery.
In the area of childhood cancer additional priority needs to be given to developing innovative, effective interventions for children at early ages, under 10 years of age, when they are most receptive to parental and adult influences.
Environmental influences also have an impact on children.
Areas of particular concern and opportunity during early childhood for prevention of cancer include, but are not limited to, tobacco use, sun exposure, and diet and nutrition.
Another area for our Prevention initiatives includes the development of pivotal trials in chemoprevention to help us determine that pivotal decision point in the NCI's chemoprevention drug development program to determine efficacy.
In the area of New Avenues for the Development of Therapeutics additional effort would be devoted to recent discoveries in chemistry and biology to encourage the formation of interdisciplinary teams for drug discovery with the expertise needed to generate novel structures, their screening against defined biological or biochemical targets, and the optimization of lead structures.
The unprecedented power of chemical and biological combinatorial techniques have made it possible to generate impressive structural variation in the laboratory.
At the same time the fast-paced identification of gene products, gene sequences, and pathways relevant to neoplasia enables the creation of novel assays for biological functions relevant to cancer.
The area of Genetics and Medicine is another area in which the NCI has placed a major investment and is an area that holds significant promise for further understanding of the cancer problem.
Recent advances in our understanding of human genetics have provided an important new opportunity to identify cancer genes through studies of cancer-prone families; in just the past seven years, more than 20 such genes have been discovered in this way.
This approach unlocks vast potential to expand our knowledge of the origins of cancer, to develop new ways to detect a tumor in an early stage, and to identify new targets for cancer therapies.
Our plan to extend our knowledge and use of cancer genetics addresses scientific discovery, clinical research, medical application, and social responsibility and is a major area for pursuit within this budget level.
Also, within this area is the development of a Cancer Genetics Network.
This network is a multicenter, interdisciplinary cooperative that will serve as an infrastructure to investigate the genetic basis of human cancer susceptibility, explore mechanisms for integrating this information into medical practice, and identify means to address the psychosocial, ethical, and legal issues associated with human cancer genetics.
The Cancer Genetics Network cooperative will present diverse needs that must be supported through an informatics infrastructure.
The infrastructure should at minimum address several key needs: informatics support to enrollment of individuals into the Cancer Genetics Network, electronic access to genetic services and educational material, an electronic registry of cancer genetics clinical and research protocols, and an electronic clearinghouse of cancer genetics research resources.
The area of Computers And Advanced Instrumentation is another of the NIH Emphasis area in which NCI will play a key role.
Our plan is to discover and develop techniques that will increase the precision, accuracy, and scope of imaging diagnosis and integrate imaging further into the practice of clinical oncology.
To advance medical imaging technology for the benefit of cancer patients and those at risk, we must address three particularly important challenges.
Specifically, we must: develop a plan for a comprehensive imaging research program; coordinate the development of imaging technology with medical need; and create a suitable infrastructure for the timely and definitive clinical evaluation of emerging imaging technologies.
We have created a working group devoted to imaging technologies.
Identical in concept to the very successful working groups devoted to molecular diagnostics and cancer genetics, experts from diverse disciplines have been challenged to help NCI develop a plan for taking full advantage of the current and developing scientific opportunities relating to imaging.
Underpinning all of our programs and areas for emphasis is an Infrastructure to include expanded clinical trials and additional patients onto treatment trials to address critical questions more rapidly.
Additional innovative training programs as well as expanded salary support for clinical, prevention and control investigators would be added.
An expanded infrastructure for managing health data and emerging trends in cancer research would be initiated.
SPECIALIZED-COMPREHENSIVE RESEARCH CENTERS
Mr. Porter: You propose to establish three new specialized-comprehensive research centers in FY'99.
Briefly describe these new centers including where they will be located.
Dr. Klausner: You may already be aware of the fact that this fiscal year, the Case Western Reserve/University Hospitals Ireland Cancer Center was recognized as an NCI-designated Comprehensive Cancer Center.
The NCI expects to see three additional new NCI-designated Comprehensive Cancer Centers recognized in FY99, expanding these types of centers from the current number of 31 to 34.
In addition, with the new flexibility in the NCI guidelines for cancer centers, we expect to see many more successful center applications with more focused scientific emphases, e.g., epidemiology, imaging etc.
However, the actual number and the location of these new comprehensive centers and /or specialized centers will depend on the outcome of peer review.
The NCIs funding criteria will rely primarily on scientific excellence, but strategic geographic locations will be considered before developing any final funding plans.
DIETARY GUIDELINES
Mr. Porter: What do the NCI Dietary Guidelines prescribe and how are they different from the joint DHHS/USDA Dietary Guidelines for Americans?
Dr. Klausner:
The NCI Dietary Guidelines advocates the following: * Reduce fat intake to 30 percent or less of calories * Increase fiber intake to 20 to 30 grams daily, with an upper limit of 35 grams * Include a variety of vegetables and fruits in the daily diet * Avoid obesity * Consume alcoholic beverages in moderation, if at all * Minimize consumption of salt-cured, salt-pickled, and smoked foods
The USDA/HHS Dietary Guidelines for Americans are as follows: * Eat a variety of foods * Balance the food you eat with physical activity - maintain or improve your weight * Choose a diet with plenty of grain products, vegetables, and fruits * Choose a diet low in fat, saturated fat, and cholesterol * Choose a diet moderate in sugars * Choose a diet moderate in salt and sodium * If you drink alcoholic beverages, do so in moderation
The guidelines are designed to help Americans choose diets that will meet nutrient requirements, promote health, support active lives and reduce chronic disease risks, including several types of cancer, coronary heart disease, and obesity.
The guidelines describe food choices that contain the amounts of nutrients that are adequate to meet the needs of most healthy people.
While the wording of NCI guidelines and USDA guidelines differ, their contents are highly concordant.
Further guidance may be found in the Food Guide Pyramid, which was developed by the US Department of Agriculture and supported by DHHS.
It is based on USDA's research on what foods Americans eat, what nutrients are in these foods, and how to make the best food choices to promote good health.
Guidance may also be found through the Nutrition Facts Label, a new regulation from the Nutrition Labeling and Education Act of 1990 from the Food and Drug Administration of DHHS and the Food Safety and Inspection Service of the US Department of Agriculture.
Together the Food Guide Pyramid and the Nutrition Facts Label serve as educational tools to put the dietary guidelines into the kinds and amounts of food to eat each day.
The Food Guide Pyramid illustrates the number of servings and the importance of balance among the five food groups in a daily eating pattern.
The recommended number of daily servings from each of the five major food groups are:
Food Group Number of Servings
Bread, Cereal, Rice and Pasta 6-11
Vegetable 3-5
Fruit 2-4
Milk, Yogurt and Cheese 2-3
Meat, Poultry, Fish, Dry Beans, Eggs, and Nuts 2-3
Most Americans eat fewer than the recommended number of servings of grain products, vegetables and fruits, even though consumption of these foods is associated with a substantially lower risk for many chronic diseases, including certain types of cancer.
Thus, the National Cancer Institute in partnership with the Produce For Better Health Foundation supports the "5 A Day For Better Health" program, a national education campaign to encourage Americans to eat 5 or more servings of fruits and vegetables each day.
COLLABORATIONS WITH CDC
Mr. Porter: It has recently been proposed that the CDC join the NCI in establishing a series of working groups related to cancer communication, cervical cancer, special populations, cancer genetics, and breast cancer.
What is the status of this proposal?
Dr. Klausner: On May 20, 1997, NCI and CDC staff met to discuss current collaborations between the two federal agencies and the establishment of working groups related to a variety of issues and activities.
After much discussion, representatives from both CDC and NCI agreed that establishing formal working groups might not be needed at this time.
Instead, an umbrella working group will hold annual meetings to brief appropriate CDC and NCI staff about progress made in current activities, as well as to discuss future collaborations.
Joint projects will continue on a more informal basis.
CDC and NCI agreed to identify points of contact for specific areas of collaboration to ensure follow up.
The goals of expanded collaborations include increased: * communication * opportunities for joint efforts * coordination of efforts -- using resources for complementary efforts * partnerships -- each agency has contacts with groups that may be unique; these can be brought together so that more diverse federal and private sector groups are included in discussions and projects
The two agencies agreed to collaborate on reports such as a summary of federal legislative activities that affect state health departments, and other issues related to cancer detection, diagnosis, treatment, control, and prevention including the impact of genetic testing on the health insurance industry.
Current and Ongoing NCI/CDC Collaborations and Plans for the Future
Prostate, Lung, Cervical, and Ovarian Cancer Screening Trial (PLCO)
Collaborations to increase participation in this screening trial have been under way for some time.
CDC and NCI have awarded a contract modification to identify strategies that will enhance accrual of minorities to the trial.
NCI and CDC are supporting 3 PLCO projects through a memorandum of understanding: 1) Henry Ford Health System PLCO Screening Center in Detroit--a small study to identify effective ways of reaching African American men; Pittsburgh PLCO Screening Center--a study on the factors affecting older African Americans and cancer screening, and; the University of Alabama-Birmingham to operate a minority-focused screening center for the PLCO Trial.
CDC is interested in looking at the value and effectiveness of various recruitment strategies, while NCI will be assessing the effectiveness of screening in reducing mortality from these cancers.
Evaluation projects are included in these joint efforts.
Cancer Information Service (CIS) Outreach Project, 5 A Day
Between 1995 and now, NCI and CDC have collaborated on efforts to improve access of underserved populations to the CIS through work with state health departments.
NCI is interested in the ability of the CIS to reach these populations with these messages and how to better use CIS as a resource.
NCI and CDC collaborated on an ad in that ran in Family Circle to encourage consumption of 5 fruits and vegetables a day.
Cancer Information Service and Breast Cancer Screening
The NCI is partnering with the CDC to insure the best utilization of Federal resources for breast and cervical cancer screening services provided by CDC through its state health department grantees.
The CIS provides educational materials and assistance in promoting the screening program to the public.
CDC gave NCI funds to hire four new Outreach Coordinators to support the CDC programs in Massachusetts, Arkansas, Washington, and Illinois.
Cancer Surveillance, Year 2000 National Health Interview Survey Supplement (NHIS)
Collaborations have been under way for several years and have included the American Cancer Society, the American College of Surgeons, and the North American Association of Central Cancer Registries (NAACCR).
One project involves an attempt to answer several key questions: 1) what is cancer surveillance?; 2) what information is missing?; and 3) how is the data used? Other projects include developing standard protocols for data collection that includes non-hospital (out-patient) sources, and both CDC and NCI funded sites.
NCI is working with CDC to determine how to get questions added to the 1999/2000 NHIS.
These will encompass topics such as screening, health behaviors, and health status.
Tobacco Control
Joint efforts have been under way for many years.
Currently programs, including ASSIST and IMPACT, are under way.
Of primary importance are efforts to prevent young people from beginning to use tobacco products.
A new collaboration with the CDC and the Veterans Administration (VA) focuses on the updating of radioepidemiologic tables.
These tables, originally prepared by NCI, present data linking risk for cancer to exposure to radioactive materials and are based on complicated calculations and risk assumptions.
The VA is requesting the updating of information because the original tables date back to the mid 80's.
The joint venture between NCI and CDC will be ultimately implemented by CDC to include risk from all diseases or conditions that may result of radiation exposure.
Representatives from appropriate NCI and CDC divisions will be held at the NIH in May 1998.
The purpose of this retreat will be to review the activities and/or research related to all aspects of radiation biology in the two agencies.
This retreat will help to facilitate this project to update the radioepidemiologic tables.
Genetics
This is a relatively new area of collaboration.
NCI is providing support for a DNA repository that is being established as part of the CDC supported National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (NHANES) III.
This repository will be available for studying genetic polymorphisms in about 1,000 people.
In addition, feedback from consumer-advocates is needed to learn about the appropriateness of genetic testing through this mechanism.
CDC is also working with the NCI to write a genetics primer that will describe and explain genetic epidemiology for advocates.
NCI staff are developing genetic educations materials in collaboration with CDC.
CANCER SURVIVORSHIP
Mr. Porter: When was the Office of Cancer Survivorship established?
Dr. Klausner: The Office of Cancer Survivorship (OCS) was established in July 1996 and is located in the Office of the Director, Division of Cancer Control and Population Sciences.
Mr. Porter: What is its mission?
Dr. Klausner: The Office of Cancer Survivorship provides a focus at the NCI for the support of research and education aimed at professionals who deal with cancer patients and survivors, and the survivors themselves.
In so doing, the NCI recognizes the large number of individuals now surviving cancer.
The mission of the Office of Cancer Survivorship (OCS) is the development and support of a research agenda that explores the long and short term physical and psychological effects of cancer and it s treatment.
In addition, the OCS provides a focus for the continuous education of professionals engaged in caring for and promoting the health and well-being of survivors.
It is expected that changes in treatment will come about as a result of the research results.
Problems facing cancer survivors are multifaceted.
They include physical, emotional and social stresses arising as a result of the effects of treatment, changes in lifestyle, disruption of home and family roles, and the fear of recurrence.
Physical morbidity is an issue for the cancer survivor, as are physchologic and social morbidity.
Cancer survivors often live with compromise, and face potential challenges arising as a result of changes in their strength and endurance, reproductive capacity, sexuality and body image.
Cancer is a disease with both physical and psychosocial sequelae.
It is important to keep in mind that the problems of the cancer survivor are not simple extensions of the problems incurred by treatment, but are qualitatively different.
They are more diverse and less medically oriented in nature.
There is a trend away from illness related problems and toward societal and interpersonal issues.
The NCI Office of Cancer Survivorship was established by the Director, NCI to address the research questions associated with surviving cancer.
Currently, there are over 8 million cancer survivors in the United States.
The Office of Cancer Survivorship explores the physical, psychological, and economic well-being of individuals who are cancer survivors.
The office supports research covering the spectrum of issues facing cancer survivors including long-term medical and psychosocial effects of cancer treatment, factors that predispose survivors to second malignancies, reproductive problems following cancer treatments, and insurance/ employment issues unique to cancer survivors.
This office seeks input from not only the scientific community but also from advocacy groups to help shape its research agenda.
The office has made its first 20 awards as competitive supplements to existing grants and cooperative agreements.
These awards included co-funding from the Public Health Service Office of Women's Health and the private Susan G. Komen Breast Cancer Foundation.
In addition an RFA has been issued soliciting research proposals which explore problems affecting long term -- more than five years -- cancer survivors.
The supplement program and the RFA grew out of priority setting workshops held in 1996 and 1997 that included broad participation including consumer advocates.
CLINICAL TRIALS PROGRAM REVIEW GROUP
Mr. Porter: A report of the NCI Clinical Trails Program Review Group was finalized in September, 1997.
What were the findings and recommendations of this report?
Dr. Klausner: Clinical research is an integral part of medical care, especially in oncology, where our ability to cure some cancers is the result of incremental improvements in chemotherapy regimens or surgery or radiotherapy regimens defined in clinical trials.
The Clinical Trials System is an extremely complex enterprise involving interactions and participation by many different groups and interests.
It is an unique resource, however, the complexity has resulted in inefficiencies which have resulted in suboptimal productivity.
There are other important challenges to clinical research, including diminished opportunities for training, managed care, cost containment, low levels of participation in research and diminishing levels of financial support for patient care and research.
These challenges come at a time when there are unprecedented opportunities for scientific and medical progress based on our increased understanding of molecular biology, genetics and immunology and rapidly developing technologies, including imaging and informatics to support relevant research.
These competing forces of expanding opportunities and contracting resources require new approaches.The Committee made approximately 48 recommendations which fell into several areas: * Retention and recruitment of clinical scientists in oncology through establishment of a patient-oriented research study section and training programs for research careers.
* Increase recruitment of participants for clinical trials by fully funding cooperative groups at levels recommended by peer review, rather than the 50-60% level common in most groups, by reducing administrative and other burdens for physicians entering patients onto clinical trials and by working to convince insurance industry payers that clinical trials are the preferred way to care for cancer patients and that patient care costs should be reimbursed.
The committee also recommended continued recruitment efforts aimed at minorities, involving patients in clinical trials decision making, simplifying the informed consent process and enhancing marketing and public awareness efforts.
* Improve efficiency in clinical trials methodology by simplifying clinical trials design and informed consent documents, by participating in the development of NCI's electronic data reporting systems and by developing uniform data collection across the clinical trials system and uniform data reporting and broad access to relevant electronic databases.
* Increase collaboration and cooperation in clinical trials by enhanced interactions between NCI and the Food and Drug Administration, and the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries.
NCI administrative structure and the clinical trials system need modification to remove administrative burdens, improve efficiency and allow greater independence for cooperative groups.
Following receipt of the report in September 1997, the NCI appointed a 37 member Clinical Trials Review Implementation Committee comprised of senior physicians, scientists, patient advocates and others, both NCI and non-NCI staff, to work together to formulate specific initiatives and programs to respond to the recommendations of the Clinical Trials Review Report.
In addition, the Implementation Committee is addressing other areas of the structure and function of the clinical trials program which the original committee did not address.
This Implementation Committee hopes to conclude its work this summer with specific proposals, modifications and initiatives to implement the recommended changes in the clinical trials program.
STRATEGIC TECHNOLOGY SPECIALIST
Mr. Porter: What is a strategic technology specialist?
Dr. Klausner: It has become increasingly clear through our discussions with the scientific community, particularly from our Working Groups on Extraordinary Opportunities, that new technologies can dramatically accelerate the progress of research.
To ensure that the cancer research community maximally benefits from the opportunities offered by new technologies, the NCI has expanded its commitment to support the development of technologies that can speed progress in cancer research.
The NCI has recruited two Assistants to the NCI Director specifically charged with identifying new technologies that can play a strategic role in cancer research programs.
The Assistants to the Director for Strategic Technologies actively seek out new technologies under development in academia, industry, or other government programs that could provide value to the cancer research community, through discussions and visits with individual investigators, involvement in scientific meetings on diverse technology areas, and active liaison with other government programs supporting technology development.
The information acquired about new technologies and areas of technology opportunity are conveyed to me, as well as shared with scientific staff of the institute and scientists in the extramural cancer research community.
The acquisition and exchange of this information throughout the institute and with members of the research community has contributed to our scientific planning process and the development of new initiatives, as well as to new collaborations for cancer researchers with technology developers.
These scientists also convey information about the areas of opportunity for novel technologies to support cancer research to various technology development communities and recruit the participation of technology developers in meeting these technology challenges through discussions and visits to laboratories and industrial sites developing novel technologies, as well as through scientific presentations at meetings relevant to a variety of disciplines including engineering, physics and biotechnology.
The communication of our technological objectives to the technology development research community has encouraged the participation of investigators from various disciplines to take on development projects that will target cancer research applications.
DIGITAL MAMMOGRAPHY AND TELEMAMMOGRAPHY
Mr. Porter: Describe the difference between digital mammography and telemammography.
Dr. Klausner: The process of traditional mammography includes x-rays being beamed through breast tissue, a resulting image is created by the x-ray and is captured on sheets of photographic film.
Due to the many physiological variabilities in breast tissues and lesions, the images captured on the films can sometimes be suboptimal, and additional mammograms may be required in order to make an accurate diagnosis.
Currently, there are methods in which the film images can be converted into electronic computer images, but this can also result in a loss of mammographic detail.
Digital mammography is a newly-developed technology that captures the images directly into an electronic computer format rather than on film.
This format then gives the physician the flexibility to individually optimize each mammogram using the computer, rather than exposing the patient to additional x-rays.
"
Telemammography is the technology used to transmit mammographic images from one site to another electronically, and the requirements of this technology are quite demanding.
Electronic mammographic images --either generated from the conversion of film images to electronic images, or mammographic images that are generated using digital mammography-- contain a very large amount of subtle information that must be transmitted precisely.
However, the potential of telemammography is great.
Mammograms can be performed on women at remote or mobile sites, and this information can be sent electronically to physicians for expert diagnosis and consultation.
MINORITY HEALTH OFFICES
Mr. Porter: How are the Office of Research on Minority Health and the Office of Special Populations different?
Dr. Klausner: The NIH Office of Research on Minority Health (ORMH) differs from the Office of Special Populations Research (OSPR) in several important ways.
ORMH is administratively located in the Office of the NIH Director, whereas OSPR reports directly to the Director of the NCI.
The ORMH has an independent budget and can fund intramural research projects as well as extramural grants and contracts; in contrast, OSPR does not directly fund research, but rather coordinates special population activities and develops concepts for research initiatives which are then implemented by the relevant NCI Division.
The OSPR focuses on cancer-related issues in special populations, which include racial/ethnic subgroups and rural, low-income and medically-underserved populations, whereas ORMH activities encompass all health-related issues for racial and ethnic minorities.
PDQ
Mr. Porter: You have also been working with patient and consumer groups to rewrite the NCI PDQ information system to enhance access to clinical trials information.
How are you proceeding with this goal?
Dr. Klausner: To assist patients and the public to make informed decisions about their options for care, the National Cancer Institute (NCI) has launched a broad initiative in partnership with patient advocate groups to make information on clinical trials available to patients and the public on the World Wide Web -- www.nabco.org.
In the first phase of the initiative, the National Alliance of Breast Cancer Organizations (NABCO) and the NCI summarized the active breast cancer trials in PDQ in lay language.
Each summary provides a description of the study, the name and phone number of a physician participating in the study, links to a glossary, and a link to the complete summary for those who want more detailed information.
Users can search for consumer-oriented trial summaries by cancer diagnosis; type of treatment; sponsor; drug; phase of clinical investigation, ID number, city, state, and country.
These summaries have been reviewed by volunteers from approximately 25 advocacy groups as well as representatives of the NCI's Clinical Trials Cooperative Groups on the reading level, formatting, and level of detail.
Comments received from this evaluation were used to refine the summaries.
The clinical value of the revised summaries are now undergoing an evaluation with cancer patients who are considering participation in clinical trials.
In addition to the breast cancer trials, information about other trials may be obtained through the PDQ, a comprehensive, computerized cancer information database.
A wide variety of cancer information is available from PDQ including details on over 1,500 ongoing clinical trials is now available through the World Wide Web. NCI has launched a new website providing comprehensive information about clinical trials -- http://cancertrials.nci.nih.gov.
Access to PDQ as well as other information is available through this site.
PDQ contains an extensive register of clinical trial protocols, with information from studies around the world, full-text information statements describing the latest advances in cancer treatment, supportive care, screening, and prevention, as well as information about selected anti-cancer drugs currently under clinical evaluation, and directories of over 23,000 physicians and over 11,000 organizations active in cancer treatment and care.
Most information statements appear in two versions, a technical version for the health professional and a lay version that is in English and Spanish.
The database is updated monthly by editorial boards of oncology experts.
CANCER GENETICS NETWORK VERSUS HUMAN GENOME PROJECT
Mr. Porter: How is the Cancer Genetics Network different from the Human Genome Project?
Dr. Klausner: The Human Genome Project (HGP) is an international research program designed to construct detailed genetic and physical maps of the human genome, to determine the complete nucleotide sequence of human DNA, and to localize the estimated 50,000-100,000 genes within the human genome.
The scientific products of the HGP will comprise a resource of genomic maps and DNA sequence information that will provide detailed information about the structure, organization and characteristics of human DNA, information that constitutes the basic set of inherited "instructions" for the development and functioning of a human being.
Specific goals are to complete a human genetic map of highly informative markers, sequence the DNA of the whole human genome, develop new technology such as automation and robotics, and complete the mapping of the mouse genome.
A major challenge to basic scientists and clinical researchers is the translation of this vast amount of information on the human genome into knowledge that is clinically relevant and useful to medical care.
The goal of the Cancer Genetics Network is to enable research addressing the range of basic, translational, and clinical issues in human cancer genetics that are described below.
Through the formation of the Network, participating groups will have access to resources, information, and expertise that are beyond the scope of a single institution, to answer critical questions in the following areas of cancer genetics:
The Genetics of Cancer Susceptibility: The identification of cancer susceptibility genes is still in its infancy, and it is likely that the majority of susceptibility genes have yet to be identified.
Even for the genes identified to date, there are still many questions to be addressed.
-- What is the prevalence of germline mutations of familial cancer susceptibility genes in different populations?
-- What is the penetrance of germline mutations in these genes? Is a single germline mutation in a familial cancer susceptibility gene sufficient for increased risk? Do all germline mutations in familial cancer susceptibility genes have the same phenotype?
-- What is the risk conferred by genes of the lower penetrance class? Do the low penetrance genes modify the risk associated with germline mutations in cancer susceptibility genes?
-- What are the environmental exposures that interact with susceptibility genes to cause cancer?
The Translation of Genetics into Medical Practice: The integration of genetic susceptibility information into medical practice holds significant promise of new approaches for cancer prevention and treatment.
Unfortunately, many of the most basic questions concerning the clinical significance of germline mutations in familial cancer susceptibility genes are unanswered, and it is unclear how to use genetic susceptibility information to alter outcomes.
-- Can adherence to public health cancer prevention strategies alter cancer morbidity and mortality among individuals with genetic susceptibility to cancer?
-- Does prophylactic surgery to remove target risk organs improve survival?
-- Do carriers of cancer susceptibility genes benefit equally from screening technologies such as mammography and PSA testing?
-- - Does genetic constitution influence response to cancer treatment?
-- Can specialized prevention and treatment strategies be identified that take advantage of the knowledge of constitutional genotype?
Public Health Issues in Genetic Susceptibility: The opportunities afforded by advances in cancer genetics also raise enormous challenges.
The consequences of widespread access to individual genetic information about susceptibility, even of uncertain clinical significance, are largely unknown.
-- What are the ethical and psychosocial issues that will affect healthy individuals and their families who may carry cancer susceptibility gene mutations?
-- How can people be helped to make informed decisions about testing for genetic susceptibility?
-- How can information about genetic information be effectively and responsibly communicated to individuals, health professionals, and the general public?
-- How can the nation's health care infrastructure be extended to accommodate the responsible delivery of widespread genetic testing for cancer susceptibility genes?
Capitalizing on advances in the area of hereditary cancer predisposition requires scientific resources and study populations that are currently unavailable to most human genetics programs.
The purpose of the Cancer Genetics Network is to support the formation of a multicenter, interdisciplinary cooperative which will serve as an infrastructure for collaborative research investigations into the genetic basis of human cancer susceptibility, explore mechanisms for integrating this information into medical practice, and identify means to address the psychosocial, ethical and legal issues associated with human cancer genetics.
The Cancer Genetics Network will also facilitate the exchange of human cancer genetics information and resources within the larger cancer genetics community.
The Network will develop mechanisms to broaden access to genetic services and educational materials by both the public and health care professionals.
It will establish a clearinghouse of human cancer genetics resources and develop means to extend access to and connections between cancer genetics researchers, providers of genetic services, and the general public.
Thus, the Network will be a hybrid between the traditional models of Cancer Centers--with recognized scientific excellence--and the cooperative clinical trials groups--with efficient multiline recruitment.
Through this research infrastructure, potential study populations are preassembled through multiple participating centers and linked to a collective scientific expertise in cancer genetics.
It is envisioned that groups participating in the Cancer Genetics Network consortium will have access to resources, information, and expertise that are beyond the scope of any single institution or organization.
PROSTATE CANCER PROGRESS REVIEW GROUP
Mr. Porter: When can we expect the recommendations of the prostate cancer progress review group?
Dr. Klausner: The report of the Prostate PRG, describing the group's findings and recommendations, will be available by early summer 1998.
Mr. Porter: Do you anticipate that this process will establish new research priorities for prostate cancer?
Dr. Klausner: Yes.
The PRGs are charged to identify and prioritize scientific research opportunities and needs to advance medical progress, and describe the scientific resources needed to address these opportunities and needs.
They then compare and contrast these priorities with the NCI cancer research portfolio prepared by NCI staff.
It is likely that new research priorities will emerge from this process.
Mr. Porter: Can you identify areas where progress has been made in recent years in prostate cancer research and where you believe new investments would lead to the more progress in the coming years?
Dr. Klausner: After a more than seven year study NCI-supported researchers recently reported that hormone therapy after radiation therapy can prolong disease-free survival and perhaps overall survival of patients with locally advanced prostate cancer.
Although hormone therapy is known to be an effective treatment for metastatic prostate cancer, its use had not been assessed in combination with radiation from initial treatment of locally advanced disease.
The NCI is also sponsoring the Prostate Cancer Outcomes Study in order to provide new information about the reasons for variations in prostate cancer diagnostic and treatment practice patterns, and to describe health-related quality of life (QOL) following alternate treatments for clinically localized and metastatic prostate cancer in a representative patient population.
Under evaluation will be variations in diagnostic and treatment practices and QOL by geographic region, ethnic/racial subgroups, income, education and health insurance status.
The impact of various treatments on QOL will be the focus of this effort, since for many men, particularly those with shorter life expectancies, the most relevant issues with respect to treatment choice are the tradeoffs between QOL and the potential for reduction of mortality from prostate cancer.
Other NCI-sponsored projects are making progress in understanding better the causes of prostate cancer.
Two large case-control studies are evaluating risk factors for prostate cancer, one among U.S. blacks and whites at high risk for prostate cancer, and one among Chinese in Shanghai, China where risk for this disease is low.
Thus far, it appears that vasectomy at a young age and a family history of prostate cancer are both prostate cancer risk factors.
In this ongoing study, DNA from prostate tissue will be examined for viral and mutant human genes, and the results analyzed together with data from blood tests and information on medical, sexual, family, and dietary history.
In another multi-center case-control study, risk factors for prostate cancer are being evaluated among African American, Asian, and White men in California, Hawaii, and Canada.
A study being carried out at the University of North Carolina is assessing whether excess prostate cancer in African Americans is associated with lower intake of omega-3 fatty acids.
The first large-scale prevention trial for prostate cancer is underway at 222 sites across the U.S.
The Prostate Cancer Prevention Trial, an intergroup study designed to test whether taking the drug finasteride will prevent prostate cancer, is coordinated by the Southwest Oncology group and is sponsored by NCI.
Eighteen thousand men ages 55 and older are participating in the study.
Completion of the following studies are a high priority and will lead to significant progress.
- Prostate, Lung, Colon, and Ovarian Cancer Screening Trial and the other prostate cancer screening studies in Europe is imperative in order to determine if screening decreases mortality and to determine the proportion of men receiving unnecessary treatment.
For prostate cancer, men will have a digital rectal exam and a blood test for PSA.
Special efforts are being made to enroll minority groups in this trial, including establishment of a new screening center, co-sponsored by the CDC, focusing on recruiting African Americans and two additional minority screening centers which will be added this year.
- The Prostate Intervention Versus Observation Trial (conducted in collaboration with the Department of Veterans Affairs) will determine if the most common treatment for localized disease actually saves lives.
At present, it is possible that many men with localized prostate cancer receive unnecessary treatment.
- The Cancer Genome Anatomy Project may ultimately allow us to understand and predict the biologic behavior of prostate cancer.
It may help us determine which prostate cancers need treatment and which do not.
Currently, prostate cancer is the most highly represented cancer site in the CGAP database with 16 cDNA libraries, over 29,000 cDNA sequences, and 352 tissue-unique genes identified to date.
CLINICAL TRIALS BY TYPE OF CANCER
Mr. Porter: Provide a table that shows the number of clinical trials underway for each of the types of cancer.
Dr. Klausner: The following table lists the type of cancer and the number of clinical trials in progress.
The clinical trials data include all clinical trials sponsored by the NCI, as well as Phases I, II, III, all modalities, and all types - - diagnostic, prevention, screening, supportive care, treatment.
The International Cancer Information Center (ICIC) provides an array of cancer information for scientists, health care professionals, and the public.
ICIC staff are responsible for developing and maintaining Physician Desk Query (PDQ).
NCI's PDQ is a web-based database containing information about controlled, randomized clinical trials on all types of cancer screening, prevention and treatment.
PDQ includes clinical trials sponsored by the NCI, as well as by NIH - other than NCI, Non-United States clinical trials group, Pharmaceutical companies, and other sponsors.
In addition, ICIC also maintains the CancerNet^TM Web site (http://cancernet.nci.nih.gov), a repository of current cancer-related information, including selected PDQ information, NCI Fact Sheets, and cancer community news and information.
The following clinical trials data was obtained using PDQ as of April 7, 1998.
Type of Cancer Number of Clinical Trials Sponsored by NCI AIDS-Related Lymphoma 14 Adrenocortical 3 Anal 6 Bladder 25 Brain, Adult 40 Brain, Childhood 76 Breast 99 Carcinoid, Gastrointestinal 1 Cancer of Unknown Primary Origin 4 Cervical 28 Colon 55 Esophageal 30 Extrahepatic Bile Duct 8 Eye Cancer 3 Fallopian Tube 15 Gallbladder 7 Gastric 26 Germ Cell, Extragonadal 6 Hypopharyngeal 39 Laryngeal 40 Acute Lymphocytic Leukemia, Adult 41 Acute Lymphocytic Leukemia, Childhood 54 Acute Myeloid Leukemia, Adult 53 Acute Myeloid Leukemia, Childhood 41 Chronic Lymphocytic Leukemia 21 Chronic Myelogenous Leukemia 52 Hairy Cell Leukemia 3 Lip / Oral Cancer 40 Liver, Adult Primary 14 Liver, Childhood Primary 2 Lung, Non Small Cell 66 Lung, Small Cell 32 Lymphoma, Hodgkin's Adult 56 Lymphoma, Hodgkin's Childhood 19 Lymphoma, Central Nervous System 2 Lymphoma, Cutaneous T-Cell 11 Lymphoma, Non Hodgkin's Adult 92 Lymphoma, Non Hodgkin's Childhood 33 Mesothelioma 2 Metastatic Carcinoma 27 Myelodysplastic Syndrome 32 Myeloproliferative disorders 53 Nasopharyngeal 27 Neuroblastoma 19 Oropharyngeal 40 Ovarian, Epithelial 67 Ovarian, Germ Cell 8 Pancreatic 32 Paranasal Sinus and Nasal Cavity 23 Parathyroid 2 Penile 1 Plasma Cell 37 Primary CNS Lymphoma 2 Prostate 62 Rectal 44 Renal Cell 18 Renal Pelvis and Ureter, Transitional Cell 7 Salivary Gland 5 Ewing's Sarcoma
